<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89517-0100 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.5-17-89.f2.A1099</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4703"/><ITAG tagnum="50">NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Biweekly Notice Applications and Amendments to Operating LicensesInvolving No Significant Hazards Considerations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>Pursuant to Public Law (P.L.) 97-415, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission(the Commission) is publishing this regular biweekly notice. P.L. 97-415revised section 189 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),to require the Commission to publish notice of any amendments issued, orproposed to be issued, under a new provision of section 189 of the Act.This provision grants the Commission the authority to issue and make immediatelyeffective any amendment to an operating license upon a determination bythe Commission that such amendment involves no significant hazards consideration,notwithstanding the pendency before the Commission of a request for a hearingfrom any person. This biweekly notice includes all notices of amendments issued, or proposedto be issued from April 22, 1989, through May 5, 1989. The last biweeklynotice was published on May 3, 1989 (54 FR 19843). <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF CONSIDERATION OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATINGLICENSE AND PROPOSED NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION DETERMINATIONAND OPPORTUNITY FOR HEARING </ITAG>The Commission has made a proposed determination that the following amendmentrequests involve no significant hazards consideration. Under the Commission'sregulations in 10 CFR 50.92, this means that operation of the facilityin accordance with the proposed amendments would not (1) involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The basis for this proposed determination for eachamendment request is shown below. The Commission is seeking public comments on this proposed determination.Any comments received within 30 days after the date of publication of thisnotice will be considered in making any final determination. The Commissionwill not normally make a final determination unless it receives a requestfor a hearing. Written comments may be submitted by mail to the Regulatory PublicationsBranch, Division of Freedom of Information and Publications Services, Officeof Administration and Resources Management, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, and should cite the publication date and page numberof this <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. Written comments may also be deliveredto Room P-216, Phillips Building, 7920 Norfolk Avenue, Bethesda, Marylandfrom 7:30 a.m. to 4:15 p.m. Copies of written comments received may beexamined at the NRC Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street,NW., Washington, DC. The filing of requests for hearing and petitions forleave to intervene is discussed below. By June 16, 1989, the licensee may file a request for a hearing with respectto issuance of the amendment to the subject facility operating licenseand any person whose interest may be affected by this proceeding and whowishes to participate as a party in the proceeding must file a writtenpetition for leave to intervene. Requests for a hearing and petitions forleave to intervene shall be filed in accordance with the Commission's ``Rulesof Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. If arequest for a hearing or petition for leave to intervene is filed by theabove date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, designatedby the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safety and LicensingBoard Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition and the Secretaryor the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board will issue a noticeof hearing or an appropriate order. As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall setforth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceeding,and how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding.The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention shouldbe permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) thenature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to theproceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial,or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of anyorder which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest.The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subjectmatter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Anyperson who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has beenadmitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave ofthe Board up to fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfythe specificity requirements described above. Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to thepetition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions whichare sought to be litigated in the matter, and the bases for each contentionset forth with reasonable specificity. Contentions shall be limited tomatters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. A petitionerwho fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirementswith respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participateas a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subjectto any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have theopportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, includingthe opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. If a hearing is requested, the Commission will make a final determinationon the issue of no significant hazards consideration. The final determinationwill serve to decide when the hearing is held. If the final determination is that the amendment request involves no significanthazards consideration, the Commission may issue the amendment and makeit immediately effective, notwithstanding the request for a hearing. Anyhearing held would take place after issuance of the amendment. If the final determination is that the amendment involves a significanthazards consideration, any hearing held would take place before the issuanceof any amendment. Normally, the Commission will not issue the amendment until the expirationof the 30-day notice period. However, should circumstances change duringthe notice period such that failure to act in a timely way would result,for example, in derating or shutdown of the facility, the Commission mayissue the license amendment before the expiration of the 30-day noticeperiod, provided that its final determination is that the amendment involvesno significant hazards consideration. The final determination will considerall public and State comments received before action is taken. Should theCommission take this action, it will publish a notice of issuance and providefor opportunity for a hearing after issuance. The Commission expects thatthe need to take this action will occur very infrequently. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filedwith the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Service Branch, or may bedelivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building,2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, by the above date. Where petitionsare filed during the last ten (10) days of the notice period, it is requestedthat the petitioner promptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephonecall to Western Union at 1-(800) 325-6000 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700).The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number3737 and the following message addressed to (<T3>Project Director</T3>): petitioner's name and telephone number; datepetition was mailed; plant name; and publication date and page number ofthis <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice. A copy of the petition should also besent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions,supplemental petitions and/or requests for hearing will not be entertainedabsent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or thepresiding Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, that the petition and/or requestshould be granted based upon a balancing of factors specified in 10 CFR2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v) and 2.714(d). For further details with respect to this action, see the application foramendment which is available for public inspection at the Commission'sPublic Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington,DC, and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved.<ITAG tagnum="84">Arkansas Power andamp; Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-313 and 50-368,Arkansas Nuclear One, Units 1 and 2, Pope County, Arkansas </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldrevise the Technical Specifications for each unit to reflect planned changesin Arkansas Power andamp; Light Company's (APandamp;L's) organization for ArkansasNuclear One (ANO). The proposed amendments include both title changes andorganizational restructuring. Also included are corresponding changes inthe designated members of the Plant Safety Committee. The specific changesproposed are: (1) The position of Executive Director, Nuclear Operationsis deleted, and this position's duties and responsibilities are dividedbetween the corporate Vice President, Nuclear (formerly the Vice President,Nuclear Operations), and the Director, Nuclear Operations (a new position);(2) The Vice President, Nuclear will have the following managers reportingto him directly: Director, Nuclear Operations; General Manager, Engineering(formerly General Manager, Design Engineering); General Manager, TechnicalSupport and Assessment (formerly General Manager, Plant Support); GeneralManager, Nuclear Quality (unchanged); and General Manager, Nuclear Support(a new title); (3) The Director, Nuclear Operations will be the onsitemanager responsible for those activities necessary for safe operation andmaintenance of the units. The following managers will report directly tothe Director, Nuclear Operations: Unit 1 Plant Manager; Unit 2 Plant Manager;Manager Central Operations; Manager, Nuclear Standards; and Manager, WorkControl. Each Unit Plant Manager will be responsible for separate operations,maintenance, and maintenance engineering organizations dedicated to eachunit. The Manager, Central Operations (new position) will be responsiblefor radiation protection, chemistry, providing support services to bothunits, and outage planning. The Manager, Nuclear Standards (new position)will be responsible for maintaining procedures and administrative controlsfor both units. The Manager, Work Control will be responsible for the functioningof the work control center in support of maintenance, modification, andoutage activities; (4) The General Manager, Engineering will be responsiblefor design engineering, the onsite engineering organization, plant modifications,and activities associated with design and configuration control of theunits, and providing engineering support as needed to operations, maintenance,licensing, and plant assessment; (5) The General Manager, Technical Supportand Assessment will be responsible for Licensing, physical security, ANOtraining, procurement, operational events assessment, plant projects activities,nonconformance report processing, and the functioning of the Plant SafetyCommittee; (6) The General Manager, Nuclear Support will be responsiblefor the financial, administrative, and support staffs formerly under directcontrol of the Vice President, Nuclear; and (7) The duties and responsibilitiesof the General Manager, Nuclear Quality are unchanged. The duties and responsibilities of the Plant Safety Committee (PSC) areunchanged. However due to the extensive restructuring and numerous positiontitle changes, the composition description of the PSC membership is changed.The Manager, Nuclear Standards is designated as the PSC Chairman (formerlydesignated as General Manager, Plant Support). Changes in positions ortitles of positions designated as voting members of the PSC are both UnitPlant Managers (formerly the Operations Manager), a designated radiationprotection manager (formerly the Health Physics Superintendent), the Manager,Plant Engineering (formerly the Engineering Manager), and Superintendent,Operations Assessment (new member). The other positions designated as votingPSC members are unchanged. These are the Superintendents of Reactor Engineeringand Quality Assurance, the Training Manager, and for Unit 2, a NuclearSoftwear Expert. The Plant Licensing Supervisor position is deleted fromthe PSC. The total number of persons on the PSC is unchanged at 9 members.Also, the requirements regarding quorum and meeting frequency are unchanged.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application ofthe standards in 10 CFR 50.92 by providing certain examples (51 FR 7744).One of the examples (i) of these actions involving no significant hazardsconsideration relates to a purely administrative change to Technical Specifications.The proposed changes to the Technical Specifications for Arkansas NuclearOne, Units 1 and 2 are associated with a planned licensee reorganization.Although personnel assignments are revised, and position titles and reportingrequirements are changed, the commitments to certain minimum qualificationsand organizational reporting requirements are unchanged. The planned organizationalrestructuring is designed to improve accountability, promote more efficientoperation, and result in an overall improvement in safety at ANO. The designationof the Manager, Nuclear Standards as the PSC Chairman is appropriate becausehe is responsible for establishing and maintaining quality in plant operationaland administrative procedures. A significant function of the PSC is thereview of procedures that affect nuclear safety. The designation of theOperations Assessment Superintendent as a PSC member is also appropriatebecause of the PSC responsibility to review reportable events. These proposedchanges are administrative in nature and do not decrease the level of managementcontrols presently in the Technical Specifications, and therefore, involveno significant hazards. The changes requested do not involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident or other adversecondition over previous evaluations; or create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident or condition over previous evaluations; orinvolve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Based on this information,the staff proposes to determine that the proposed changes do not presenta significant hazard. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Tomlinson Library, ArkansasTech University, Russellville, Arkansas 72801 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Nicholas S. Reynolds, Esq., Bishop, Cook,Purcell, andamp; Reynolds, 1400 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20005-3502<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Jose A. Calvo <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-325 and50-324, Brunswick Steam Electric Plant, Units 1 and 2, Brunswick County,North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>June 23, 1987, as supplementedMarch 29, 1989. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldadd incinerated oil surveillance and radioactive release requirements tothe Radiological Environmental Technical Specifications (RETS). <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazard consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a nosignificant hazard consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). Aproposed amendment to an operating license involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The Carolina Power andamp; Light Company (CPandamp;L) has reviewed the proposedchanges to TS and has determined that the requested amendment does notinvolve a significant hazards consideration for the following reasons:<ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluatedbecause the incineration of radioactive waste oil does not affect the function,operation, or failure mode analysis of any safety-related equipment atthe Brunswick Plant. Other changes are administrative in nature and, therefore,do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated forthe same reasons as stated in Item 1. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety because the addition of Item C in Table 4.11.2-1ensures that each batch of radioactive waste oil is analyzed prior to incineration,thereby, maintaining annual releases to less than 0.1 percent of 10 CFR50, Appendix 1 limits. </ITAG>The staff has evaluated the proposed changes and find that the changeswill formalize licensee commitments to procedures that have been used bythe licensee. These commitments were previously approved by the staff underthe Brunswick Radiololgical Environmental Technical Specifications (RETS)Program. The staff has reviewed the CPandamp;L determinations and is in basic agreementwith them. Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that thesechanges do not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3298. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>R. E. Johnson, General Counsel, CarolinaPower andamp; Light Company, P. O. Box 1551, Raleigh, North Carolina 27602.<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-400, ShearonHarris Nuclear Power Plant, Unit 1, Wake and Chatham Counties, North Carolina</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>March 30, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment affectstwo Technical Specifications (TS) associated with refueling operations.The first is Specification 3/4.9.1, Boron Concentration. Currently, Table4.9-1 provides a valve arrangement intended to prevent a boron dilutionevent while in Mode 6. The specified valve arrangement does not allow theRefueling Water Storage Tank (RWST) to be refilled while in Mode 6. Theproposed change allows an alternate valve arrangement, permitting makeupto the RWST. Also, the following adminstrative changes would be made toSpecification 3/4.9.1 to make it easier to use and to avoid possible operatorconfusion. The table related to administrative controls on valves to prevent dilutionduring refueling, Table 4.9-1, in TS 3/4.9.1 would be moved from the surveillancesection of the TS, referenced in the Limiting Condition for Operation (LCO)section and renumbered as Table 3.9-1 because it is more appropriate andless likely to produce confusion in th LCO section. In addition, the renumberedTable 3.9-1 would be reformatted. The reformating of Table 3.9-1 wouldinclude a retitled and descriptively expanded ``Valve Position During Refueling''column. The second change is to Specification 3/4.9.2, Instrumentation. This changeis purely administrative in nature intended to clarify that both actionrequirements must be fulfilled with two inoperable Source Range NeutronFlux Monitors. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards in 10 CFR 50.92(c) for determiningwhether a significant hazards consideration exists. A proposed amendmentto an Operating License for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityof consequences of an accident previously evaluated, or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated, or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided the followingno significant hazards consideration determination: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.Technical Specification 3/4.9.1 establishes administrative controls overcertain valves during refueling operations to preclude the possibilityof uncontrolled boron dilution of the filled portion of the RCS. This actionprevents flow to the RCS of unborated water by closing flow paths fromsources of unborated water. However, the current arrangement requires valve1CS-149 to be locked closed which prevents makeup of borated water to theRefueling Water Storage Tank (RWST). The proposed change allows alternatevalve arrangement, permitting makeup to the RWST. Requiring valves 1CS-155and 1CS-156 to be maintained closed with their main control board switchesin the ``Shut'' position and manual valves 1CS-265, 1CS-274, and 1CS-287to be locked closed provides operational flexibility with respect to boratedwater sources while administratively precluding the possibility of uncontrolledboron dilution event in Mode 6. Therefore, boron dilution while in Mode6 remains a non-credible event and neither the probability or consequencesof a Mode 6 boron dilution event are affected by the proposed change. Theremaining changes to Technical Specifications 3/4.9.1 and 3/4.9.2 are administrativein nature and, therefore, can not increase the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. Thechange merely provides an alternate valve arrangement which isolates sourcesof unborated water while in Mode 6. This valve arrangement offers an equivalentmethod for ensuring that boron dilution while in Mode 6 remains a non-credibleevent to that of the existing specification. As such, this change doesnot create a new or different kind of accident. The remaining changes toTechnical Specifications 3/4.9.1 and 3/4.9.2 are administrative in natureand, therefore, can not create the possibility of a new or different kindof accident from any accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reductionin the margin of safety. As stated above, the alternate valve arrangementof the proposed amendment provides an equivalent method for ensuring thatboron dilution while in Mode 6 remains a non-credible event. As such, themargin of safety is not affected by the proposed amendment. The remainingchanges to Technical Specifications 3/4.9.1 and 3/4.9.2 are administrativein nature which clarify the specifications and, therefore, do not involvea reduction in the margin of safety. </ITAG>The licensee has concluded that the proposed amendment meets the threestandards in 10 CFR 50.92 and, therefore, involves no significant hazardsconsideration. The NRC staff has made a preliminary review of the licensee's no significanthazards consideration determination and agrees with the licensee's analysis.Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that the requested amendmentdoes not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Cameron Village RegionalLibrary, 1930 Clark Avenue, Raleigh, North Carolina 27605. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>R. E. Jones, General Counsel, CarolinaPower andamp; Light Company, P. O. Box 1551, Raleigh, North Carolina 27602<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-237 and 50-249, DresdenNuclear Power Station, Unit Nos. 2 and 3, Grundy County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment request: </T3>December 21, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>Commonwealth Edison Company(CECo) has proposed changes to the Dresden Units 2 and 3 Technical Specifications(TS) that would remove excessive testing requirements for other systemsor subsystems of the Emergency Core Cooling Systems (ECCS) or Standby GasTreatment Systems (SBGT) when one system or subsystem is inoperable. PresentTS surveillance requirements for ECCS and SGTS provide for demonstratingthe operability of other systems or subsystems when one of the followingsystems, subsystems, or components is inoperable: Core Spray subsystem;Low Pressure Coolant Injection (LPCI) pump; LPCI subsystem; ContainmentCooling subsystem service water pump, Containment Cooling subsystem; HighPressure Coolant Injection (HPCI) subsystem; relief valves of the AutomaticDepressurization System; Isolation Condenser system; unit or shared dieselgenerator; or SBGT subsystem. For example, if one Core Spray subsystemis inoperable, the current TS would require that the operability of theoperable Core Spray subsystem and the LPCI subsystem be demonstrated immediatelyand daily thereafter. The proposed amendment would remove excessive system testing requirementswhile maintaining adequate assurance of systems operability needed foraccident mitigation. The present testing requirements for ECCS and SBGTwere chosen to be very conservative at a time when there was a lack ofplant operating history and lack of a sufficient equipment failure database to choose other testing methods. Since initial development of theDresden Unit 2 and 3 Technical Specifications, plant operating experiencehas demonstrated that multiple testing of other ECCS or SBGT systems whenone system is inoperable is not necessary to provide adequate assuranceof system operability. Operability of these systems is shown by checkingrecords to verify that valve lineups, electrical lineups and instrumentationrequirements have not been changed since the last time the system was verifiedto be operable. These changes are consistent with more recent BWR TechnicalSpecifications that accept system operability based on satisfactory performanceof monthly, quarterly, refueling interval, post maintenance or other specifiedperformance tests without requiring additional testing when another systemis inoperable. In addition the proposed amendment would change the following: (1) The HPCI operability requirements in TS Sections 3.5.C/4.5.C from wheneverthe reactor pressure is greater than 90 psig to whenever the reactor pressureis greater than 150 psig. Currently the HPCI isolates below a steam linepressure of 100 psig which is inconsistent with the operability requirements.In addition, the proposed change to 150 psi is supported by system designflow and pressure requirements, present testing requirements, and providesmargin to the present setpoint for system automatic isolation on low steamline pressure; (2) The Surveillance Requirement 4.5.C.1 of the TS for the HPCI pump flowtesting to add a second low reactor steam pressure flow rate test whichwill be performed each refueling outage or an outage during which HPCImaintenance was performed; (3) TS Sections 3.5.D and 3.5.E to raise the minimum operability requirementsfor the Automatic Pressure Relief and the Isolation Condenser from 90 psigto 150 psig. This change of operability will preserve consistency betweenthe TS for HPCI, Automatic Depressurization System and the Isolation Condenser;(4) Sections 3.7.B.2/4.7.B.2 and 3.7.B.3/4.7.B.3 of the TS for the SGTSto delete outdated requirements, provide clarifications, provide administrativechanges and provide frequency of performing SGTS surveillances consistentwith other testing provisions in the TS and in compliance with RegulatoryGuide 1.52; and (5) Sections 4.7.C.1.a, b and d for Dresden Unit 2, 3.7.C.2/4.7.C.2, andDefinition Z of the TS for the Secondary Containment Integrity Requirementsto: (a) delete outdated requirements; (b) provide administrative changes;(c) provide clarifications (i.e. change term ``circuit'' to describe SGTSto ``subsystem''; (d) allow 4 hours to restore secondary containment priorto requiring an orderly reactor shutdown to at least hot shutdown withinthe next 12 hours and cold shutdown within the following 24 hours; (e)a change to surveillance frequency to permit performance within allowedextensions; and (f) relocate operability requirements of the Core Sprayand LPCI subsystems from the Secondary Containment TS Section to Section3.5.A related to Core Spray and LPCI requirements. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsiderations if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not; (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee addressed the above three standards in the amendment applicationas follows: <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated because: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. The present testing requirements for ECCS and SBGT when one system(or subsystem) is inoperable represent requirements beyond those necessaryto adequately demonstrate system operability. Other testing requirementsthat are not affected by this proposed amendment provide assurance thatremaining ECCS and SBGT systems are operable and capable of performingtheir design intent. The proposed deletion of multiple system testing willconform Dresden Units 2 and 3 to current BWR plant operating practices.ECCS and SBGT perform accident mitigation functions. Because changing testingrequirements will not change the probability of accident precursors, thisproposed amendment does not affect the probability of an accident previouslyevaluated. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increasein the consequences of an accident previously evaluated because testingother than multiple system testing ensures that the present level of operabilityfor the ECCS and SBGT systems is maintained. Changes proposed to Sections3.5.A.7 and 3.5.F.1 are administrative in nature and do not alter the intentof present Technical Specifications requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The proposed amendment allows the HPCI operability provisionsin LCO 3.5.C.1 and 3.5.C.3 to be in compliance with system design requirements.The proposed amendment clarifies and adds to the surveillance requirementsfor HPCI subsystem testing. Additional HPCI subsystem flow rate testingis specified on an operating cycle interval to ensure HPCI operabilityat low reactor pressure. When performed during startup after an outage,this testing will be completed prior to reaching rated reactor pressure,thus providing assurance that HPCI will function as designed. Because theproposed changes ensure consistency between design and Technical Specificationrequirements and enhance present HPCI testing provisions, no increase inaccident probability or consequences is involved. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) The proposed amendment preserves consistency between TechnicalSpecifications for HPCI, ADS and the Isolation Condenser. System availabilityat reactor pressures exceeding the capabilities of the LPCI and core spraysystems is not changed. FSAR Section 6.2.7 analyses take credit for LPCIand core spray flow prior to reaching a reactor pressure of 150 psig. Section6.2.7 does not take credit for the Isolation Condenser. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) The changes proposed for the SBGT system specification involveadministrative as well as changes to provide consistent application ofsurveillance interval provisions. The Note 1 provisions are outdated andnot required to be used for the SBGT system. The terminology change toSBGT ``subsystem'' is administrative in nature and cannot affect any accidentanalysis. The change to the surveillance frequency recognizes that useof maximum surveillance interval extensions is appropriate and followsthe intent of present Definition CC. The performance of the required surveillanceswill be performed with the allowed extensions per Definition CC. This surveillancefrequency change is not significant and follows present industry testingmethods for allowing surveillance interval extensions. Due to the administrativenature of the changes, and because the change is made to provide consistencyin application of surveillance intervals without reducing the availabilityof the SBGT system, these changes do not represent a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) The proposed amendment adds reasonable repair time for SecondaryContainment Integrity and specifies an orderly plant shutdown rather thandefaulting to the provisions of Specification 3.0.A. Adding these provisionsto the Technical Specifications does not affect an accident previouslyevaluated. The 4-hour time frame allowed for repairs is very small in termsof providing an accident window. The proposed 36-hour time for an orderlyreactor shutdown is similar to current provisions in LCO 3.7.B.1.b on SBGTand is the same shutdown provisions required by current Specification 3.0.A.Therefore, the 4-hour repair time and the 36-hour reactor shutdown provisiondo not involve a significant increase in the consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. The proposed amendment will clarify the provisionsof Definition Z on Secondary Containment Integrity and this change is consideredadministrative in nature. The changes to delete completed preoperationaltesting, delete first cycle testing requirements, delete an expired one-timeexception and to move 3.7.C.2/4.7.C.2 to Section 3.5.A are also consideredto be administrative in nature. These administrative changes cannot affectthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously evaluated because: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. The change deletes excessive testing requirements for ECCS andSBGT, provides clarification of terminology, and provides consistency inlocation of requirements. These changes do not introduce any new modesof operation which could initiate a new or different kind of accident.The proposed amendment will not introduce any new types of equipment failurethat could cause a new or different kind of accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The proposed change above does not modify the present HPCI systemdesign or reduce its capability to perform its intended design function.HPCI subsystem testing and demonstration of operability is enhanced bythe proposed changes; therefore, there is no possibility of a new or differentkind of accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. The proposed change does not modify the present ADS and IsolationCondenser design or reduce its capability to perform their intended function.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">d. The changes for SBGT do not allow any new modes of plant operationnor do they represent any physical modifications to the SBGT system. Therefore,these changes cannot create the possibility of a new or different kindof accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">e. This amendment request adds a repair time for Secondary ContainmentIntegrity and places reactor shutdown provisions in LCO 3.7.C. This changedoes not allow any new modes of operation which could initiate a new ordifferent kind of accident. This change also provides a clarification whichis administrative in nature to ensure proper interpretation of DefinitionZ on Secondary Containment Integrity requirements. The remaining changesproposed to Secondary Containment section are administrative in nature;therefore, there is not possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously evaluated due to these changes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety because:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. The proposed amendment will not reduce the availability of ECCSor SBGT systems when required to mitigate accident conditions. Excessivetesting of systems and components can reduce rather than increase reliability.An acceptable level of testing to demonstrate operability currently beingused at later BWR plants does not include multiple testing of other ECCSor SBGT systems when one or more systems is inoperable. The testing thatwill remain in the Technical Specifications provides adequate assuranceof system performance. The two administrative changes proposed to Section3.5, due to their nature, cannot involve a significant reduction in themargin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The proposed changes raise the Technical Specification minimumreactor pressure for operability of HPCI from 90 to 150 psig; however,this change is made to recognize present HPCI design parameters and tocorrect the Technical Specification. HPCI operating pressure overlap withthe low pressure ECCS injection pumps is not affected by this change since,(a) actual HPCI design flow and pressure ability has not been modified,and (b) the low pressure system admission valves actuate between 300 and250 psig during a design basis LOCA blowdown. HPCI testing requirementsare clarified and enhanced by these proposed changes thus providing additionalassurance of HPCI operability when required. HPCI system design performancerequirements are not modified by this change. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. The proposed changes raise the Technical Specification minimumreactor pressure for operability of Automatic Pressure Relief and the IsolationCondenser from 90 to 150 psig. Adequate system operating pressure overlapwith the low pressure ECCS injection pumps is preserved since the low pressureadmission valves are set to open between 300 and 350 psig. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">d. The changes to SBGT involving deletion of Note 1 and changing terminologyto SBGT ``subsystem'' are administrative changes that cannot affect anymargin of safety. The change to the surveillance frequency can allow longersurveillance intervals then present, but these allowances are small andare accepted as standard industry testing practice. Therefore, the changeto the surveillance frequency does not represent a significant reductionin the margin of safety involving availability of the SBGT system. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) The proposed 4-hour repair time for Secondary Containment Integrityis a reasonable time frame to allow for determination of the problem andfor correcting the problem. The present omission of a repair time couldcause an unneeded shutdown and does not reflect current operating practiceat later BWR plants. The 36-hour plant shutdown requirement reflects present3.0.A requirements. The proposed change to Definition Z on Secondary ContainmentIntegrity, the proposed deletion of Surveillance Requirements 4.7.C.1.a,4.7.C.1.b, 4.7.C.1.d for Unit 2, and the proposed change to move Specification3.6.C.2/4.7.C.2 are administrative in nature and do not represent a reductionin the margin of safety. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards analyses givenabove. Based on this review, the staff proposes to determine that the proposedamendments meet the three 10 CFR 50.92(c) standards and do not involvea significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Morris Public Library, 604Liberty Street, Morris, Illinois 60450. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Michael I. Miller, Esquire; Sidley andAustin, One First National Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60603. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Daniel R. Muller <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-373 and 50-374, LaSalleCounty Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, LaSalle County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>March 16, 1989 <T3>Description of amendments request: </T3>The proposed amendments toOperating License No. NPF-11 and Operating License No. NPF-18 would revisethe LaSalle Units 1 and 2 Technical Specifications to conform with thediesel generator test schedule recommendations given in NRC Generic Letter84-15 and, additionally, remove footnotes which are no longer applicableto bring the Unit 1 Technical Specifications into conformance with theUnit 2 Technical Specifications. The current requirements given in Table4.8.1.1.2-1 would be replaced with the proposed requirements given in Table4.8.1 of Generic Letter 84-15. The new test schedule will help to establishthe reliability of the diesel generators to an acceptable level while reducingthe degradation of the diesel generators caused by excessive testing. Administrativechanges to the Unit 1 Technical Specifications have also been proposedto remove unnecessary footnotes and to correct an error in paragraph 3.8.1.1.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether no significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from an accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has determined, and the NRC staff agrees, that the proposedamendment will not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated because the diesel generator test scheduleis a technique for establishing the reliability of the diesel generators.The new test schedule, as proposed in the amendment request, will helpto establish the reliability of the diesel generators, to an acceptablelevel, while reducing the degradation of the diesel generators caused byexcessive testing. Since the reliability of the diesel generators is notdegraded, and may actually be improved by the proposed change, the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated will not be increased.2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated because the proposed test schedule does notdegrade the reliability of the diesel generators, therefore, the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident is not created by the proposed changes.3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety because thespecification revisions to the proposed test schedule do not degrade thereliability of the diesel generators, therefore, the proposed amendmentdoes not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. Sincethe proposed amendment will reduce the degradation of the diesel generatorscaused by excessive testing, the margin of safety may actually be improved.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Public Library of IllinoisValley Community College, Rural Route No. 1, Ogelsby, Illinois 61348. <T3>Attorney to licensee: </T3>Michael I. Miller, Esquire; Sidley and Austin,One First National Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60603. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Daniel R. Muller <ITAG tagnum="84">Detroit Edison Company, Docket No. 50-341, Fermi-2, Monroe County,Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>September 21, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed change will reviseSpecification 3/4.3.4, ATWS Recirculation Pump Trip System Instrumentation.The proposed TS changes provide appropriate provisions for the two-out-of-twotrip logic and will allow Fermi-2 TS to better reflect the as-built plantdesign. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists [10 CFR 50.92(c)] for a proposed amendentto a facility operating license. A proposed amedment to an operating licensefor a facility in accordance with the proposed amendent would not: (1)Involve a significant increase in the probability or conseqences of anaccident previously evaluated; or (2) Create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or (3)Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has evaluated the proposed changes against the above standardsas required by 10 CFR 50.92. The licensee concluded that: <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The proposed change to delete the present ACTION b. which allowsone channel of ATWS Recirculation Pump Trip System Instrumentation in onetrip system to remain inoperable for 14 days with no requirement that itbe placed in the trip condition and to replace this ACTION with four actionstatements with an increasing progression of ACTIONS according to severity,does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. Their proposed change is appropriatedue to the deletion of the Reactor Recirculation Pump drive motor breakertrips which utilized a one-out-of-one trip logic for each drive motor breaker.The remaining trip of the Reactor Recirculation Pump field breakers remainsunchanged. This trip utilizes a two-out-of-two trip logic of either RPVWater Level Low-Level 2 or RPV Pressure-High. The proposed ACTION b. whichaddresses one inoperable channel in one or both trip systems, requiresplacing the inoperable channel(s) in the tripped condition within 1 hour.This ACTION would not result in a trip of the pump, but upon receipt ofthe second trip signal for the same trip function (level or pressure) inthe same trip system, a trip would result as intended. The probabilityand consequences of an accident has not been increased since this proposedACTION is consistent with other instrument ACTIONS which place a channelin the tripped condition if this can be accomplished without causing thetrip function to occur. In addition, the change does not result in anymodifications to the plant or system operation and no safety-related equipmentis altered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to add ACTION c., which addresses the conditionof two or more channels less than required by the Minimum OPERABLE Channelsper Trip System requirement, does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. TheACTION is subdivided depending on which channels are inoperable. (1) Ifthe inoperable channels consists of one RPV Water Level Low-Level 2 channeland one RPV Pressure-High channel, both channels are placed in the trippedcondition within 1 hour. This ACTION will not result in a pump trip ifthe other channels are OPERABLE. However, if placing these channels inthe tripped condition would result in a trip of the pump (the other channelfor the same trip function in the same trip system being tripped), thetrip system is declared inoperable. (2) If the inoperable channels includetwo channels for the same trip function, i.e., two RPV Water Level Low-Level2 channels or two RPV Pressure-High channels, the trip system is declaredinoperable. If the channels were both placed in the tripped condition,a trip would occur. The probability and consequences of an accident hasnot been increased as the ACTIONS taken are conservative with respect tothe trip function and the trip will automatically occur when actuated bythe remaining OPERABLE channels. In addition, the change does not resultin any modifications to the plant or system operation and no safety-relatedequipment is altered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed ACTION d., for one inoperable trip system, which wouldallow 72 hours to restore the inoperable trip system to OPERABLE statusor be in at least STARTUP within the next 6 hours, does not involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.The other trip system would be OPERABLE and capable of performing the tripactuation. The probability and consequences of an accident has not beensignificantly increased as the proposed change requires the inoperablesubsystem to be returned to OPERABLE status within 72 hours. In addition,the change does not result in any modifications to the plant or systemoperation and no safety-related equipment is altered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed ACTION e., for both trip systems inoperable, which requiresthat at least one trip system be restored to OPERABLE status within 1 houror be in at least STARTUP within the next 6 hours, does not involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.The 1 hour limit is appropriately conservative to return at least one tripsystem to OPERABLE status. The probability and consequences of an accidenthas not been significant increased as the ACTION requires the plant tobe in at least STARTUP within the next 6 hours. In addition, the changedoes not result in any modifications to the plant or system operation andno safety-related equipment is altered. The proposed change to footnote,*, in Table 3.3.4-1, ATWS Recirculation Pump Trip System Instrumentation,to allow one channel to be placed in an inoperable status for up to 2 hoursfor required surveillance provided the other channel of the same trip functionis OPERABLE, does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The footnote, as proposed,ensures that an OPERABLE channel is monitoring a trip function during surveillancetesting. The channels for the other trip function are now covered by theACTION requirements and thus no longer need to be included in the footnote.The probability and consequencesof an accident has not been increased asthe proposed change is consistent with other instrumentation Specificationsfor allowable surveillance time. In addition, the change does not resultin any modifications to the plant or system operation and no safety-relatedequipment is altered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The proposed change to replace the existing ACTION statement withthe proposed four ACTION statements does not create the possibility ofa new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. As in (1) above, the change does not result in any modifications to theplant or system operation and no safety-related equipment is altered. Therequested change does not create any new accident mode. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to footnote, *, in Table 3.3.4-1, ATWS RecirculationPump Trip System Instrumentation, to allow one channel to be placed inan inoperable status for up to 2 hours for required surveillance providedthe other channel of the same trip function is OPERABLE, does not createthe possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accidentpreviously evaluated. As stated in (1) above, the change does not resultin any modifications to the plant or system operation and no safety-relatedequipment is altered. The requested change does not create any new accidentmode. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The proposed change to replace the existing ACTION statement withthe proposed four ACTION statements does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. As stated in (1) above, the deletion of ACTION b.,which does not address placing an inoperable channel in the tripped condition,and replacing it with four ACTIONS (b. through e.) to allow placing inoperablechannels in the tripped condition where appropriate, allows the ACTIONSto more appropriately address the as-modified plant design. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to footnote, *, in Table 3.3.4-1, ATWS RecirculationPump Trip System Instrumentation, to allow one channel to be placed inan inoperable status for up to 2 hours for required surveillance providedthe other channel of the same trip function is OPERABLE, does not involvea significant reduction in a margin of safety. As stated in (1) above,the allowance for surveillance is consistent with those in other instrumentationSpecifications and is appropriate for this Specification since the channelsassociated with the other trip function are now covered by ACTION requirements.</ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's evaluation and concurs with it. Onthe basis of the above consideration, the staff proposes to find that thechanges do not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Monroe County Library System,3700 South Custer Road, Monroe, Michigan 48161. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>John Flynn, Esq., Detroit Edison Company,2000 Second Avenue, Detroit, Michigan 48226. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Theodore R. Quay, Acting. <ITAG tagnum="84">Detroit Edison Company, Docket No. 50-341, Fermi-2, Monroe County,Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>September 30, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldchange TS Section 3/4.7.1.5 for the Ultimate Heat Sink to better reflectthe Fermi-2 as-built conditions and design bases. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists [10 CFR 50.92(c)] for a proposed amendmentto a facility operating license. A proposed amendment to an operating licensefor a facility involves no significant hazards consideration if operationof the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment would not: (1)Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of anaccident previously evaluated; or (2) Create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or (3)Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has evaluated the proposed change against the above standardsrequired by 10 CFR 50.92. The licensee concluded that the plant designbases do not: <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The changes act to provide greaterassurance that the Ultimate Heat Sink is available by providing provisionsappropriate for its design as a single water source. By allowing unlimitedoperation with the reservoirs cross-connected, the change acts to increasethe consequences of a below grade breach of the Category I RHR reservoirstructure. This is because the level of both reservoirs instead of onereservoir would equalize with the site ground water level. However, since90 percent of the reservoir capacity is below the ground water level theresultant impact on the ability of the RHR reservoirs to supply a 30-daycooling capacity is not judged to be significant. Further, adequate timefor compensatory measures for any such breach is likely to be availablesince the rapid reservoir level decrease would be easily detectable. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. The change does not modify plantdesign. The change allows unlimited operation with the reservoirs cross-connectedwhere currently a not cross-connected line-up is implied by the LCO requirementof two independent reservoirs. Cross-connected operation does not createa new accident mode since cross-connecting the reservoirs is pre-establishingthe conditions necessary for each RHR division to access the full capacityof the Ultimate Heat Sink. Thus, no new mode of failure of the UltimateHeat Sink is created. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. By providingprovisions appropriate to the design of the Ultimate Heat Sink, the changeacts to increase the margin of safety by reducing the possibility of inappropriatesystem operation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to exclude ACTIONS which allow continued operationfor an unlimited time period from the provisions of Specification 3.0.4does not: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The change allows entry into an OPERATIONALCONDITION where, if the situation covered by the ACTION were to occur whilein the OPERATIONAL CONDITION, operation for an unlimited time would beallowed. As the measures called for by the ACTIONS provide equivalent assurancethat the Ultimate Heat Sink can perform its intended functions, the probabilityand consequences of any previously evaluated accident is not changed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. The change does not modify plantdesign or operation and, therefore, creates no new accident modes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The changeallows power increases, by allowing OPERATIONAL CONDITION changes, whichpreviously would have been prohibited until the situation causing the needfor the ACTION was rectified. In these cases, however, the compensatorymeasures of the ACTION requirements provide equivalent assurance that theUltimate Heat Sink can perform its intended functions. Thus, the safetymargin is maintained. </ITAG><T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Monroe County Library System,3700 South Custer Road, Monroe, Michigan 48161. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>John Flynn, Esq., Detroit Edison Company,2000 Second Avenue, Detroit, Michigan 48226. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Lawrence A. Yandell, Acting. <ITAG tagnum="84">Detroit Edison Company, Docket No. 50-341, Fermi-2, Monroe County,Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 15, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise condition (9) of the license issued July 15, 1985, and would removefire protection Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.9, 3/4.7.7.1 through 3/4.7.7.6,3/4.7.8, and 6.2.2.e, and the corresponding Section 3/4 Bases, and reviseTechnical Specifications 6.2.2.6 and 6.5.1.6. Generic Letters 86-10, datedApril 24, 1986, and 88-12, dated August 2, 1988, provided guidance to licenseesto request removal of the fire protection Technical Specifications. Thelicensee's proposed amendment is in response to these Generic Letters.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The staff has evaluated this proposed amendment and determined thatit involves no significant hazards considerations. According to 10 CFR50.92(c), a proposed amendment to an operating license involves no significanthazards considerations if operation of the facility in accordance withthe proposed amendment would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated; or 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated; or 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed revision to the License Condition is in accordance with theguidance provided in Generic Letter 86-10 for licensees requesting removalof fire protection Technical Specifications. The incorporation of the NRCapproved Fire Protection Program and the former TS requirements by referenceto the procedures implementing these requirements, into the Updated FinalSafety Analysis Report (UFSAR), and the use of the standard License Conditionon fire protection will ensure that the Fire Protection Program, includingthe systems, the administrative and technical controls, the organization,and the other plant features associated with fire protection will be ona consistent status with other plant features described in the UFSAR. Also,the provisions of 10 CFR 50.59 would then apply directly for changes thelicensee desires to make in the Fire Protection Program. In this context,the determination of the involvement of an unreviewed safety question definedin 10 CFR 50.59(a)(2) would be made based on the ``accident...previouslyevaluated'' as being the postulated fire in the fire hazards analysis forthe fire area affected by the change. Hence, the proposed License Conditionestablishes an adequate basis for defining the scope of changes to theFire Protection Program which can be made without prior Commission approval,i.e., without introduction of an unreviewed safety question. The revisedLicense Condition and the removal of the existing TS requirements on fireprotection do not create the possibility of a new or different kind ofaccident from those previously evaluated. They also do not involve a significantreduction in the margin of safety since the proposed License Conditiondoes not alter the requirement that an evaluation be performed for theidentification of an unreviewed safety question for each proposed changeto the Fire Protection Program. Consequently, the proposed License Conditionand the removal of the fire protection requirements do not involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.The proposed modification of Administrative Controls, Section 6 of theTechnical Specifications provides requirements consistent with the administrativecontrol requirement for other programs addressed by License Conditions.Specifically, the responsibilities of the Onsite Review Organization willinclude a Fire Protection Program review under Specification 6.5.1.6. Thechanges are administrative in nature and do not impact the operation ofthe facility in a manner that involves significant hazards considerations.The proposed amendment includes the removal of fire protection TechnicalSpecifications in four areas: (1) fire detection systems, (2) fire suppressionsystems, (3) fire barriers, and (4) fire brigade staffing requirements.While it is recognized that a comprehensive Fire Protection Program isessential to plant safety, many details of this program that are currentlyaddressed in Technical Specifications can be modified without affectingnuclear safety. With the removal of these requirements from the TechnicalSpecifications, they have been incorporated into the Fire Protection Programimplementing procedures. Hence, with the additions to the existing administrativecontrol requirements that are applicable to the Fire Protection Programand the revised License Condition, there will be suitable administrativecontrols to ensure that any licensee initiated changes to these requirements,that have been removed from the Technical Specifications, will receivecareful review by competent individuals. Again, these changes are administrativein nature and do not impact the operation of the facility in a manner thatinvolves significant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Monroe County Library System,3700 South Custer Road, Monroe, Michigan 38161. Attorney for Licensee:John Flynn, Esq., Detroit Edison Company, 2000 Second Avenue, Detroit,Michigan 48226. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Lawrence A. Yandell, Acting. <ITAG tagnum="84">Detroit Edison Company, Docket No. 50-341, Fermi-2, Monroe County,Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 15, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment clarifiesthe location of the noble gas monitor in the Fermi-2 off gas system. Inaddition, the term ``HOT STANDBY'' in the Action statement of Section 3.11.2.7of the Technical Specifications (TSs) is replaced by ``STARTUP, with allmain steamlines isolated.'' <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists [10 CFR 50.92(c)] for a proposed amendmentto a facility operating license. A proposed amendment to an operating licensefor a facility involves no significant hazards consideration, if operationof the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment would not: (1)Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of anaccident previously evaluated; or (2) Create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or (3)Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has evaluated the proposed change against the above standardsas required by 10 CFR 50.92. The licensee concluded that: <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The change in the limiting condition for operation (LCO) is mainlya change in words. The term HOT STANDBY is not in Fermi-2 Technical Specifications,but the words ``hot standby'' are contained in the description of the modeswitch position as part of the definition of STARTUP in Table 1-2. Identifyingthe location of the monitor in the main condenser off gas system does notaffects its function. Therefore, this change to ``STARTUP, with all steamlines isolated,'' and clarifying the monitor location, does not increasethe probability or consequences or an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The change in terminology and description of where the monitoris measuring the off gas radioactivity does not create a new or differentkind of accident not previously analyzed. The function of the system isnot affected and the requirement to reduce reactor power and isolate themain steam lines upon evaluation of the monitor and/or core condition isnot altered by this proposed change. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The margin of safety is not significantly reduced in that neitherthe functions of the system, the action to secure the release when appropriate,nor the surveillance requirements are changed. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's evaluation and concurs with it. Onthe basis of the above consideration, the staff proposes to find that thechanges do not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Monroe County Library System,3700 South Custer Road, Monroe, Michigan 48161. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>John Flynn, Esq., Detroit Edison Company,2000 Second Avenue, Detroit, Michigan 48226. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Lawrence A. Yandell, Acting. <ITAG tagnum="84">Detroit Edison Company, Docket No. 50-341, Fermi-2, Monroe County,Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 15, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed change providesa revised list of required instrumentation in order to minimize the needfor interpretations in Specification 3/4.3.7.5, Accident Monitoring Instrumentation.As a result of the proposed change, other specifications were identifiedfor concurrent changes. Table 3.3.7.5-1 contains a footnote referring toa Special Test Exception for Oxygen Concentration. The period for whichthis exception was valid has passed. Therefore, the proposed amendmentalso includes deletion of the Special Test Exception (Specification 3/4.10.5)and corresponding footnote in Specification 3/4.6.6.2, as well as deletionof the Table 3.3.7.5-1 footnote. Deletion of the corresponding Bases forthe Special Test Exception is also proposed. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists [10 CFR 50.92(c)] for a proposed amendmentto a facility operating license. A proposed amendment to an operating licensefor a facility involves no significant hazards consideration if operationof the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment would not: (1)Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of anaccident previously evaluated; or (2) Create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or (3)Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has evaluated the proposed change against the above standardsas required by 10 CFR 50.92. The licensee concluded that: <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, to list which instruments are required to monitorthe required parameters over the ranges specified in Regulatory Guide 1.97,Revision 2, December 1980 for Reactor Vessel Water Level, Standby Gas TreatmentSystem Radiation Monitors, and Neutron Flux does not involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.The proposed change for Reactor Vessel Water Level lists Fuel Zone andWide Range. The proposed change for Standby Gas Treatment System RadiationMonitors lists SGTS-Noble Gas (Mid Range) which is the channel that automaticallystarts the accident monitors, SGTS AXM-Noble Gas (Mid Range), and SGTSAXM-Noble Gas (High Range) which are the accident monitoring channels.The footnote clarifies that the specified channels are required for eachStandby Gas Treatment System subsystem since the monitoring channels monitoronly a single subsystem each. The proposed change for Neutron Flux listsPower Range Monitors and Intermediate Range Monitors. This proposed changeis an enhancement to provide a more detailed list of required instrumentation.The probability and consequences of an accident have not been increasedby providing a more detailed list of requirements. In addition, the changedoes not result in any modifications to the plant or system operation andno safety-related equipment is altered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, for Neutron Flux to change the Required Numberof Channels from 2 to 1/division does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.The proposed change requires that of the 2 channels required, at least1 of these channels is in each division for purposes of redundancy in powersupply and instrument electronics. The probability and consequences ofan accident have not been increased by requiring redundancy for the requiredinstrumentation and in fact it has been decreased. In addition, the changedoes not result in any modifications to the plant or system operation andno safety-related equipment is altered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, to add the word ``automatic'' to Primary ContainmentIsolation Valve Position does not involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposedchange specifies automatic valves, which are those specified in 3/4.6.3,Primary Containment Isolation Valves, Section A, Automatic Isolation Valves.This is consistent with the intent of Regulatory Guide 1.97, Revision 2,December 1980. The probability and consequences of an accident have notbeen increased as this change is a clarification of the Specification.In addition, the change does not result in any modifications to the plantor system operation and no safety-related equipment is altered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, Primary Containment Isolation Valve Positionto change from ACTION 80 to 82 does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.The proposed change allows 48 hours to restore the indication to OPERABLEstatus as does the current ACTION. At that time, the current Specificationrequires that the plant be in at least HOT SHUTDOWN within the next 12hours. The proposed change would declare the valve inoperable and specifiesACTION a. of Specification 3/4.6.3, Primary Containment Isolation Valves.If the ACTIONS of Specification 3/4.6.3 cannot be satisfied, this wouldalso result in a shutdown to at least HOT SHUTDOWN within the next 12 hoursand further specifies COLD SHUTDOWN within the following 24 hours. Theprobability and consequences of an accident have not been increased sincethe ACTIONS of the Primary Containment Isolation Valve specification willensure PRIMARY CONTAINMENT INTEGRITY is promptly restored or result ina shutdown to HOT SHUTDOWN in the same period of time as the current specifiedACTION and additionally requires the plant to be in COLD SHUTDOWN withinthe following 24 hours. In addition, the change does not result in anymodifications to the plant or system operation and no safety-related equipmentis altered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, to delete Drywell Sump Level does not involvea significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. These sumps are automatically isolated on a LOCAsignal. The sumps will overflow to the Suppression Pool where level informationis available throughout the course of an accident. The probability andconsequences of an accident have not been increased since the post-accidentfunction intended by Regulatory Guide 1.97, Revision 2, December 1980 isperformed by the suppression pool instrumentation which is available andrequired by this Specification. In addition, the change does not resultin any modifications to the plant or system operation and no safety-relatedequipment is altered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, Surveillance Requirements, to coincide withthe proposed changes to the required instruments in Table 3.3.7.5-1 doesnot involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated. The proposed change to the SurveillanceRequirements is necessary such that the Surveillance Requirements supportthe OPERABILITY of the required instrumentation. The probability and consequencesof an accident have not been increased as the proposed change is requiredto support OPERABILITY of the instrumentation. In addition, the changedoes not result in any modification to the plant or system operation andno safety-related equipment is altered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.10.5, SpecialTest Exceptions - Oxygen Concentration, to delete the specification andto delete the footnote in Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, Accident MonitoringInstrumentation and 3/4.6.6.2, Drywell and Suppression Chamber Oxygen Concentration,which refers to this test exception does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.This proposed change deletes a special test exception which is not applicableafter 120 Effective Full Power Days (EFPD) of reactor operation. Fermi2 has operated greater than this limit. The probability and consequencesof an accident have not been increased since the Specification is no longervalid due to exceeding the conditions of the exception. In addition, thechange does not result in any modifications to the plant or system operationand no safety-related equipment is altered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The proposed change to the Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5,Accident Monitoring Instrumentation, to list which instruments are requiredto monitor the required parameters over the ranges specified in RegulatoryGuide 1.97, Revision 2, December 1980 for Reactor Vessel Water Level, StandbyGas Treatment System Radiation Monitors, and Neutron Flux does not createthe possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accidentpreviously evaluated. As stated in (1) above, the change does not resultin any modifications to the plant or system operations and no safety-relatedequipment is altered. The requested change does not create any new accidentmode. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, Neutron Flux to change the Required Numberof Channels from 2 to 1/division does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. Asstated in (1) above, the change does not result in any modifications tothe plant or system operation and no safety-related equipment is altered.The requested change does not create any new accident mode. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, to add the word ``automatic'' to Primary ContainmentIsolation Valve Position does not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. As stated in (1)above, the change does not result in any modifications to the plant orsystem operation and no safety-related equipment is altered. The requestedchange does not create any new accident mode. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, Primary Containment Isolation Valve Positionto change from ACTION 80 to 82 does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. Asstated in (1) above, the change does not result in any modifications tothe plant or system operation and no safety-related equipment is altered.The requested change does not create any new accident mode. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, to delete Drywell Sump Level does not createthe possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accidentpreviously evaluated. As stated in (1) above, the change does not resultin any modifications to the plant or system operation and no safety-relatedequipment is altered. The requested change does not create any new accidentmode. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, Surveillance Requirements, to coincide withthe proposed changes to the required instruments in Table 3.3.7.5-1 doesnot create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated. As stated in (1) above, the change doesnot result in any modifications to the plant or system operation and nosafety-related equipment is altered. The requested change does not createany new accident mode. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.10.5, SpecialTest Exceptions - Oxygen Concentration, to delete the specification andto delete the footnote in Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, Accident MonitoringInstrumentation and 3/4.6.6.2, Drywell and Suppression Chamber Oxygen Concentration,which refers to this test exception does not create the possibility ofa new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.As stated in (1) above, the change does not result in any modificationsto the plant or system operation and no safety-related equipment is altered.The requested change does not create any new accident mode. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The proposed change to the Technical Specification 3/4.3.7.5,Accident Monitoring Instrumentation, to list which instruments are requiredto monitor the required parameters over the ranges specified in RegulatoryGuide 1.97, Revision 2, December 1980, for Reactor Vessel Water Level,Standby Gas Treatment System Radiation Monitors, and Neutron Flux doesnot involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. As stated in(1) above, this proposed change provides a more detailed list of the instrumentsrequired since the current Specification only lists the parameter. Wheremore than one range of instrumentation is required to monitor the specificparameter, these instruments have been specified. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, Neutron Flux to change the Required Numberof Channels from 2 to 1/division does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. As stated in (1) above, this proposed change doesnot reduce the number of channels required, but specifies that at leastone channel is required for each division in order that this instrumentationbe redundant. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, to add the word ``automatic'' to Primary ContainmentIsolation Valve Position does not involve a significant reduction in amargin of safety. As stated in (1) above, since the primary containmentautomatic isolation valves are the specific item of concern, adding theword ``automatic'' would serve to clarify the specific requirement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, Primary Containment Isolation Valve Positionto change from ACTION 80 to 82 does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. As stated in (1) above, this proposed change wouldrevise the ACTION statement such that after a 48 hour period to restoreto OPERABLE status, reducing power to at least HOT SHUTDOWN within thenext 12 hours is not the only option. The proposed change would allow thealternative of declaring the valve inoperable and taking the ACTION requiredby Specification 3/4.6.3, Primary Containment Isolation Valves, ACTIONa. It may be possible to isolate the penetration, as described in 3/4.6.3and continue to operate. If this is not accomplished, the same ACTION wouldresult, i.e, in at least HOT SHUTDOWN within the next 12 hours, and further,to COLD SHUTDOWN within the following 24 hours. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, to delete Drywell Sump Level does not involvea significant reduction in a margin of safety. As stated in (1) above,the drywell sumps are isolated on a LOCA signal and the instruments donot perform a post-accident function. The sumps will overflow to the suppressionpool where level can be monitored throughout an accident scenario. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, Surveillance Requirements, to coincide withthe proposed changes to the required instruments in Table 3.3.7.5-1 doesnot involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. As stated in(1) above, this proposed change is necessary in order to support the OPERABILITYrequirements of the instrumentation listed in Table 3.3.7.5-1, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation, as revised by this proposed change. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to Technical Specification 3/4.10.5, Special TestExceptions - Oxygen Concentration, to delete the specification and to deletethe footnote in Specifications 3/4.3.7.5, Accident Monitoring Instrumentationand 3/4.6.6.2, Drywell and Suppression Chamber Oxygen Concentration, whichrefers to this test exception does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. As stated in (1) above, the provisions of this Specificationare no longer applicable since the operating exposure of the reactor corehas exceeded 120 Effective Full Power Days. The test exception was onlyvalid with exposures less than this maximum limit. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's evaluation and concurs with it. Onthe basis of the above consideration, the staff proposes to find that thechanges do not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Monroe County Library System,3700 South Custer Road, Monroe, Michigan 48161. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>John Flynn, Esq., Detroit Edison Company,2000 Second Avenue, Detroit, Michigan 48226. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Lawrence A. Yandell, Acting. <ITAG tagnum="84">Florida Power Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-302, Crystal RiverUnit No. 3 Nuclear Generating Plant, Citrus County, Florida </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 28, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldincrease the containment leakage test pressure from 49.6 psig to 53.3 psig.It would also delete surveillance requirements 4.6.1.2d.3 and 4.6.1.2.f,both of which refer to valves pressurized by a seal system, since CrystalRiver 3 does not use a seal system. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided criteria for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The amendment request was analyzed in light of the above three criteria.In regard to the first two criteria it was determined that the requestedchange to the containment leakage test pressure does not involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequence of an accident previously evaluated,nor does it create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. This is true since there wouldbe no change in operating procedures nor any physical change to the plant.The only change would be to increase the containment leakage test pressure.With regard to the deletion of Surveillance Requirements 4.6.1.2d.3 and4.6.1.2.f, both of the above criteria have been met, since Crystal River3 does not use a seal system. In regard to the third criterion it was found that the proposed changeto the containment leakage test pressure would not involve a significantreduction in a margin of safety. Appendix J of 10 CFR Part 50 requirescontainment leakage testing to be performed at the calculated peak containmentinternal pressure related to the design basis event and this value is tobe specified in either the TS or associated bases. The calculated peakcontainment internal pressure results from a loss of coolant accident.Calculations were performed by the licensee assuming an initial temperatureof 110 degrees. The resulting peak pressure was 49.6 psig. Technical Specification3.6.1.5, however, places a limit on containment air temperature of 130degrees. Therefore, calculations were performed again, this time usingthe higher value for initial temperature. These calculations showed thatthe peak pressure would reach 53.3 psig. This is still less than the designpressure of 55 psig. Therefore, changing the containment leakage test pressureto 53.3 psig will provide consistency between the Technical Specificationsand the safety analyses. Testing at not less than this maximum peak containmentinternal pressure provides assurance that containment leakage will notexceed the value assumed in the safety analyses. The proposed change ismore restrictive than the current Technical Specifications and, therefore,does not involve a significant decrease in a margin of safety. Finally, the deletion of surveillance requirements 4.6.1.2d.3 and 4.6.1.2.fwill have no impact on plant safety since Crystal River 3 does not employa seal system. The staff has performed a preliminary review of the licensee's proposedchange and agrees that the criteria of 10 CFR 50.92 are met. Therefore,the staff proposes to determine that the proposed amendment involves nosignificant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Crystal River Public Library,668 N.W. First Avenue, Crystal River, Florida 32629 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>A. H. Stephens, General Counsel, FloridaPower Corporation, MAC - A5D, P. O. Box 14042, St. Petersburg, Florida33733 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Herbert N. Berkow <ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket Nos. 50-424 and 50-425,Vogtle Electric Generating Plant, Units 1 and 2, Burke County, Georgia</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 5, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment woulddelete footnotes which are no longer applicable after the initial entryof Vogtle Unit 2 into Mode 2 operation. The Technical Specification sectionsinvolved are 3.3.3.6, 3.4.4, 3.7.1.2, 3.7.7, 3.9.1, Table 3.3-4, and Table4.3-3. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with a proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.In regard to the proposed amendment, the licensee has determined the following:<ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed change does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Theremoval of footnotes from the Technical Specifications does not affectany equipment involved in the initiation of previously evaluated accidents.The probability of such accidents is therefore not increased. The operationof the PORV's, Auxiliary Feedwater System, Piping Penetration HVAC System,and Radiation Monitors RE-0005 and RE-0006 are not affected by removalof the applicability footnotes. Therefore, the consequences of an accidentwhich would rely on this equipment are not increased. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. Thechange does not introduce any new equipment into the plant or require existingequipment to operate in a different manner from which it was designed tooperate. Since a new failure mode is not introduced by the change, a newor different kind of accident could not result. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction ina margin of safety. The change does not affect safety limits or limitingsafety system settings. The bases for the affected Technical Specificationsare not affected by removing the initial applicability footnotes; therefore,margins of safety are not reduced. </ITAG>The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's determination and concurs withits findings. Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposed changeinvolves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Burke County Public Library,412 Fourth Street, Waynesboro, Georgia 30830. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Arthur H. Domby, Troutman, Sanders,Lockerman and Ashmore, Chandler Building, Suite 1400, 127 Peachtree Street,N.E., Altanta, Georgia 30043. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-289, Three Mile IslandNuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Dauphin County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise Technical Specifications (TS) in Sections 3.5.2, 3.5.4, 5.3.1 and6.9.5 to replace the values of cycle-specific parameter limits with a referenceto the Core Operating Limits Report, which contains the values of thoselimits. In addition, the Core Operating Limits Report has been includedin the definitions section of the TS to note that it is the unit-specificdocument that provides these limits for the current operating cycle. Furthermore,the definition notes that the values of these cycle-specific parameterlimits are to be determined in accordance with the Specification 6.9.5.This section requires that the core operating limits be determined foreach reload cycle in accordance with the referenced NRC-approved methodologyfor these limits and consistent with the applicable limits of the safetyanalysis. Finally, this report and any mid-cycle revisions shall be providedto the NRC upon issuance. NRC Generic Letter No. 88-16, dated October 4,1988 provided guidance to licensees on requests for removal of the valuesof cycle-specific parameter limits from TS. The licensee's proposed amendmentis in response to and in conformance with the Generic Letter. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The staff has evaluated this proposed amendment and determined thatit involves no significant hazards considerations. According to 10 CFR50.92(c), a proposed amendment to an operating license involves no significanthazards considerations if operation of the facility in accordance withthe proposed amendment would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated; or 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated; or 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed revision to the TS is in accordance with the guidance providedin Generic Letter No. 88-16 for licensees requesting removal of the valuesof cycle-specific parameter limits from TS. The establishment of theselimits in accordance with an NRC-approved methodology and the incorporationof these limits into the Core Operating Limits Report will ensure thatproper steps have been taken to establish the values of these limits. Furthermore,the submittal of the Core Operating Limits Report will allow the staffto continue to trend the values of these limits without the need for priorstaff approval of these limits and without introduction of an unreviewedsafety question. Removal of the values of cycle-specific parameter limitsand addition of the referenced report for these limits do not create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from those previouslyevaluated. They also do not involve a significant reduction in the marginof safety since the change does not alter the methods used to establishthese limits. Consequently, the proposed removal of the values of cycle-specificlimits do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. Because the values of cycle-specific parameter limits will continue tobe determined in accordance with an NRC-approved methodology and consistentwith the applicable limits of the safety analysis, these changes are administrativein nature and do not impact the operation of the facility in a manner thatinvolves significant hazards considerations. The proposed amendment does not alter the requirement that the plant beoperated within the limits for cycle-specific parameters nor the requiredremedial actions that must be taken when these limits are not met. Whileit is recognized that such requirements are essential to plant safety,the values of limits can be determined in accordance with NRC-approvedmethods without affecting nuclear safety. With the removal of the valuesof these limits from the Technical Specifications, they have been incorporatedinto the Core Operating Limits Report that is submitted to the Commission.Hence, appropriate measures exist to control the values of these limits.These changes are administrative in nature and do not impact the operationof the facility in a manner that involves significant hazards considerations.Based on the preceding assessment, the staff believes this proposed amendmentinvolves no significant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Government Publications Section,State Library of Pennsylvania, Walnut Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Ernest L. Blake, Jr., Esquire, Shaw, Pittman,Potts andamp; Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Louisiana Power and Light Company, Docket No. 50-382, Waterford SteamElectric Station, Unit 3, St. Charles Parish, Louisiana </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>May 1, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment would authorizethe sale and leaseback of a portion of Louisiana Power andamp; Light Company's(LPandamp;L's) undivided ownership interest in the Waterford Steam ElectricStation, Unit No. 3 (W3). <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with a proposedamendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated, (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated,or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has provided an analysis of no significant hazards considerationsin its request for a license amendment. The licensee's analysis of theproposed amendment against the three standards in 10 CFR 50.92 is as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">(a) The proposed amendment to the License to reflect the sale andleaseback transaction does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed amendmentwould not result in any physical changes to the facility, and all OperatingProcedures, Limiting Conditions for Operation, Limiting Safety System Settings,and Safety Limits as specified in the Technical Specifications to </ITAG><T3>Facility Operating License No. </T3>NPF-38 will remain unchanged. LPandamp;Lwill continue to be responsible for the operation of the plant and therewill be no changes made in the operating organization or the personnelas a result of the proposed sale and leaseback transaction. <ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The proposed amendment to authorize a sale and leaseback transactionwill not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. The design and design bases ofW3 remain unchanged. Accordingly, the current plant safety analyses willremain complete and accurate when addressing the licensing bases and inanalyzing plant response and consequences. Additionally, the OperatingProcedures, Limiting Conditions for Operation, Limiting Safety System Settings,and Safety Limits as set out in Technical Specifications for Facility OperatingLicense NPF-38 will remain unchanged. Thus, the plant conditions for whichthe design bases and accident analyses were performed continue to be valid.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) The proposed amendment of the License to authorize a sale andleaseback transaction will not involve a significant reduction in the marginof safety. The plant safety margins for W3 are established through LimitingConditions for Operation, Limiting Safety System Settings, and Safety Limits,as contained in the Technical Specifications for Facility Operating LicenseNPF-38. The proposed License amendment will effect no change in eitherthe physical design of the plant or any of these safety margins as specifiedin the Technical Specifications, and there will, accordingly, be no changeto any of the margins of safety. </ITAG>The licensee has concluded that the proposed amendment meets the threestandards in 10 CFR 50.92 and, therefore, involves no significant hazardsconsideration. The NRC staff has made a preliminary review of the licensee's no significanthazards consideration determination and agrees with the licensee's analysis.Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that the requested amendmentdoes not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room Location: </T3>University of New OrleansLibrary, Louisiana Collection, Lakefront, New Orleans, Louisiana 70122<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Bruce W. Churchill, Esq., Shaw, Pittman,Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N St., NW., Washington, DC 20037 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Jose A. Calvo <ITAG tagnum="84">Nebraska Public Power District, Docket No. 50-298, Cooper NuclearStation, Nemaha County, Nebraska </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>March 20, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>In response to the Nuclear RegulatoryCommissions recommendations published in Generic Letter 88-06 dated March22, 1988, Nebraska Public Power District has requested the removal of TechnicalSpecifications Figures 6.1.1 and 6.1.2, titled ``NPPD Nuclear Power GroupOrganization Chart'' (P236) and ``NPPD Cooper Nuclear Station OrganizationChart'' (P237), respectively, and all references thereto. Generic Letter 88-06 also specifies that concurrent with the removal ofthe organizational charts from the licensee's Technical Specifications,the following general requirements should be added: 1. Line of authority, responsibility, and communication shall be establishedand defined from the highest management levels through intermediate levelsto and including all operating organization positions. Those relationshipsshall be documented and updated, as appropriate, in the form of organizationcharts, functional descriptions of departmental responsibilities and relationships,and job descriptions for key personnel positions, or in equivalent formsof documentation. This will be met through the addition of new Section 6.1.2.A to the CooperNuclear Station (CNS) Technical Specifications. The District has reviewedand approved a change to the CNS Updated Safety Analysis Report (USAR)which upgrades the operating organization description by incorporatingthe Nuclear Power Group (NPG) onsite and offsite organizational chartsand departmental descriptions of responsibilities. The affected USAR pagesreflecting this change were submitted to the NRC by letter dated January13, 1989. This change will be reflected in the next annual 10 CFR 50.71(e)USAR revision due to be submitted on or before July 22, 1989. 2. Designation of a management position in the onsite organization thatis responsible for overall unit operation and has control over those onsiteactivities necessary for safe operation and maintenance of the plant. This will be met through the addition of new Section 6.1.2.B to the CNSTechnical Specifications. Section 6.1.2.B will designate the Division Managerof Nuclear Operations as responsible for these activities. 3. Designation of an executive position that has corporate responsibilityfor overall plant nuclear safety and authority to take such measures asmay be needed to ensure acceptable performance of staff in operating, maintaining,and providing technical support to the plant to ensure nuclear safety.This will be met through the addition of new Section 6.1.2.C to the CNSTechnical Specifications. Section 6.1.2.C will designate the Nuclear powerGroup Manager as responsible for these activities. 4. Designation of those positions in the onsite organization that requirea senior reactor operator (SRO) or reactor operator (RO) license. This will be met through the addition of new Section 6.1.3.H to the CNSTechnical Specifications. The Operations Supervisor, Shift Supervisor,and Control Room Supervisor shall hold SRO licenses while Unit Operatorsshall hold RO licenses. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>In accordance with the requirement of 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee hassubmitted the following no significant hazards evaluation: <ITAG tagnum="21">A. Evaluation of this Amendment with Respect to 10 CFR 50.92 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The enclosed Technical Specification change is judged to involve nosignificant hazards based on the following: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Does the proposed change involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Evaluation</T3>: The proposed change does not involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluatedbecause the change is administrative in nature. Removal of the organizationcharts from the CNS Technical Specifications represents a change only inthe administrative control of revisions to the District's nuclear organization.As described in Section II, ``Description of changes'' above, several keyorganizational elements have been added to the CNS Technical Specifications.These organizational requirements have been developed in accordance withthe guidance provided by Generic Letter 88-06 and capture the essentialaspects of the Nuclear Power Group organization. These include the additionof Sections 6.1.2.B and 6.1.2.C which identify the positions responsiblefor overall plant safety in the Onsite and Offsite organizations respectively.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This proposed change does not effect any revision to the current nuclearorganization or the plant configuration. No changes to the Shift Complementqualifications or personnel requirements have been proposed. Further, removalof the organizational charts does not represent a physical change to theplant, a change to any plant procedure, the institution of any test orexperiment, a change in any safety analysis, or a change in organizationalconduct of operations. This proposed change, therefore, does not increasethe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Does the proposed license amendment create the possibility fora new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Evaluation</T3>: This change is administrative in nature and therefore,does not create the possibility for a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously evaluated. The District is not proposing any procedural,hardware, or organizational changes with this submittal. The organizationalfunctions important to safety will continue to be accomplished throughthe employment of persons competent in the appropriate areas of expertise.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Does the proposed amendment involve a significant reduction inthe margin of safety? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Evaluation</T3>: This proposed change does not represent any changesin plant procedure or hardware. Since this change is administrative innature, the margin of safety will not be reduced. This change has the overalleffect of increasing organizational efficiency by facilitating organizationaladaptation to changing operational needs. The provisions being added toSection 6.1 of the CNS Technical Specifications will assure the essentialaspects of the operating organization will remain intact. Additionally,any subsequent organizational changes will constitute changes to the CNSUSAR and therefore require evaluation in accordance with 10 CFR 50.59.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. Additional Basis for Proposed No Significant Hazards Determination</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application ofthe standards for determining whether a significant hazards considerationexists by providing certain examples (51 FR 7751). The examples include:``(i) A purely administrative change...'' The District feels that thisproposed change falls under this example. Additionally, Generic Letter88-06 sets forth the NRC's position that with the addition of certain administrativerequirements which ``...capture the essential aspects of the organizationalstructure...'' the onsite and offsite organizational charts may be removed.Therefore, the Districts finds that the attached proposed changed to theCNS Technical Specifications involves no significant hazards and shouldbe approved by the NRC. </ITAG>Based on the previous discussions, the licensee concluded that the proposedamendment request does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; nor create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;nor involve a significant reduction in the required margin of safety. TheNRC staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationsdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. The staff has, therefore,made a proposed determination that the licensee's request does not involvea significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Auburn Public Library, 11815th Street, Auburn, Nebraska 68305. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. G.D. Watson, Nebraska Public PowerDistrict, Post Office Box 499, Columbus, Nebraska 68601. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Jose A. Calvo <ITAG tagnum="84">Niagara Mohawk Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-220, Nine Mile PointNuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Oswego County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>May 4, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldchange Technical Specifications 3.6.2 and 4.6.2 to clarify the surveillancerequirements for Average Power Range Monitoring scram and rod block instrumentation.Specifically, in Table 4.6.2a, a footnote would be added to point out thefact that the weekly instrument channel calibration is being performedusing built-in calibration equipment. In addition, a surveillance requirementto perform a full instrument channel calibration of the APRM upscale anddownscale settings once per three months would be added to items (9)(b)(i)and (9)(b)(iii) of Table 4.6.2a. This change is to clarify that the weeklycalibration of the APRM instruments currently identified in the Nine MilePoint Unit 1 Technical Specifications is actually an adjustment of theAPRM channel based on the power level calculated by a heat balance. A fullinstrument channel calibration is performed once per three (3) months.Tables 4.6.2a and 4.6.2g would also be revised to clarify that channelcalibration is not applicable to the inoperative feature circuitry. InTable 3.6.2g, a footnote would be added to point out that actuation ofeither of the two trip systems will cause a rod block. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards (10 CFR 50.92(c)) for determiningwhether a significant hazards consideration exists. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has provided the following analysis: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed changes clarify present practices and design. Theproposed changes do not represent changes in established procedures. Therefore,the proposed changes will not affect the probability or consequences ofan accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed changes clarify present calibration practices andexisting design. The proposed changes will not change the method for performingthe calibrations. Therefore, no new or different kinds of accidents willbe created. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed changes do not affect operations or change the frequencyof calibration (surveillance). Therefore, there is no reduction in a marginof safety. </ITAG>Based on the above, the staff proposes to determine that the proposed changesdo not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Reference and Documents Department,Penfield Library, State University of New York, Oswego, New York 13126.<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Troy B. Conner, Jr., Esquire, Conner andamp;Wetterhahn, Suite 1050, 1747 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006.<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra <ITAG tagnum="84">Niagara Mohawk Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-220, Nine Mile PointNuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Oswego County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 3, 1988, as modified by lettersdated September 28 and November 15, 1988. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>By letter dated June 3, 1988,as amended September 28, 1988, the licensee proposed to amend the TechnicalSpecifications to delete Figure 6.2-1 ``Management Organizational Chart,''and Figure 6.2-2 ``Nuclear Site Organization,'' in accordance with GenericLetter 88-06, ``Removal of Organization Charts From Technical Specifications.''Administrative changes to Sections 6.1, 6.2, 6.5, 6.6, and 6.7 are includedand Specification 6.9 is being revised to make the Unit 1 Specificationsconsistent with 10 CFR 50.4. By letter dated November 15, 1988, the licenseeamended the amendment application to propose additional administrativechanges to the Specifications. These changes reflect the creation of theposition of Executive Vice President-Nuclear Operations. This title replacesall current references to Senior Vice President in the Specifications.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards in 10 CFR 50.92(c) for determiningwhether a significant hazards consideration exists. A proposed amendmentto an Operating License for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityof consequences of an accident previously evaluated, (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated,or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The staff has reviewed the licensee's submittals and finds that with respectto deletion of the organization charts: (1) The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated becausedeletion of the organization charts from the Technical Specifications doesnot affect plant operation. As in the past, the NRC will continue to beinformed of organizational changes through other required controls. Inaccordance with 10 CFR 50.34(b)(6)(i) the applicant's organizational structureis required to be included in the Final Safety Analysis Report. ChapterXIII of the Final Safety Analysis Report provides a description of theorganization and detailed organization charts. As required by 10 CFR 50.71(e),NMPC submits annual updates to the FSAR. Appendix B to 10 CFR Part 50 and10 CFR 50.54(a)(3) govern changes to organization described in the QualityAssurance Program. Some of these organizational changes require prior NRCapproval. Also, it is NMPC's practice to inform the NRC of organizationalchanges affecting the nuclear facilities prior to implementation. (2) The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident than previously evaluated because the proposedchange is administrative in nature, and no physical alterations of plantconfiguration or changes to setpoints or operating parameters are proposed.(3) The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reduction ina margin of safety because NMPC, through its Quality Assurance programs,its commitment to maintain only qualified personnel in positions of responsibility,and other required controls, assures that safety functions will be performedat a high level of competence. Therefore, removal of the organization chartfrom the Technical Specifications will not affect the margin of safety.With respect to the remaining changes, the Commission has provided guidanceconcerning the application of the criteria for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists by providing certain examples of actions involvingno significant hazards considerations and examples of actions involvingsignificant hazards consideration (51 FR 7750). One of these examples ofactions involving no significant hazards consideration is example (i),``A purely administrative change to technical specifications: for example,a change to achieve consistency throughout the technical specifications,correction of an error, or a change in nomenclature.'' The proposed changesare within the scope of this example. Based on the above, the staff proposes that the amendment will not involvea significant hazards determination. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Reference and Documents Department,Penfield Library, State University of New York, Oswego, New York 13126.<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Troy B. Conner, Jr., Esquire, Conner andamp;Wetterhahn, Suite 1050, 1747 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006.<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra <ITAG tagnum="84">Niagara Mohawk Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-220, Nine Mile PointNuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Oswego County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>September 22, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The licensee proposed to amendSection 3.4.5 of the Technical Specifications to clarify the conditionsunder which the Control Room Air Treatment System must be operable. Thecurrent Technical Specification 3.4.5 indicates that the Control Room AirTreatment System must be operable when containment integrity is required.However, containment integrity is not defined within the Technical Specifications.The Control Room Air Treatment System must be operable whenever reactorbuilding (secondary containment) integrity is required. Reactor buildingintegrity is defined in the Technical Specifications (Definition 1.12,Reactor Building Integrity). Therefore, the proposed change requires theControl Room Air Treatment System to be operable whenever reactor buildingintegrity is required. This change will improve the accuracy and clarityof the Technical Specifications. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards (10 CFR 50.92(c)) for determiningwhether a significant hazards consideration exists. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has provided the following analysis: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed change merely clarifies when the Control Room AirTreatment System is required to be operable in order to improve the accuracyof the Technical Specifications. Therefore, there will not be an increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed clarification of Control Room Air Treatment Systemoperability is an administrative change and does not create any new ordifferent kind of accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed change will not adversely affect the operation ofNine Mile Point Unit 1. Clarification of when the Control Room Air TreatmentSystem is required to be operable will not reduce the margin of safety.</ITAG>Based upon the above, the staff proposes to determine that the proposedchange does not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Reference and Documents Department,Penfield Library, State University of New York, Oswego, New York 13126.<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Troy B. Conner, Jr., Esquire, Conner andamp;Wetterhahn, Suite 1050, 1747 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006.<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra <ITAG tagnum="84">Niagara Mohawk Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-410, Nine Mile PointNuclear Station, Unit No. 2, Scriba, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 6, 1988, as modified by lettersdated July 22 and November 8, 1988. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment modifiesthe licensee's June 6, 1988 application, as amended July 22, 1988. TheJune 6, 1988, application, as amended, was noticed on September 7, 1988(53 FR 34608) and proposes to delete the organization charts from the TechnicalSpecifications in accordance with Generic Letter 88-06, ``Removal of OrganizationCharts From the Technical Specifications'' dated March 22, 1988. The November8, 1988 modification revises the application to incorporate a change inthe licensee's Nuclear Division Management Organization. The position ofExecutive Vice President - Nuclear Operations was created. This positionincorporated the authority and functions formerly performed by the SeniorVice President. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards in 10 CFR 50.92(c) for determiningwhether a significant hazards consideration exists. A proposed amendmentto an Operating License for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityof consequences of an accident previously evaluated, (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated,or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's amendment application and concludesthat: (1) The amendment will not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated because the changeis administrative in nature and is designed to enhance the operation ofthe facility. The position of Executive Vice President - Nuclear Operationsencompasses all of the authority and functions formerly performed by theSenior Vice President. Therefore, the change is essentially only a titlechange in the Specifications. (2) The amendment will not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated because as discussedabove, the change is administrative. It does not involve hardware changesto the facility and is for purposes of the Specifications a title changeonly. (3) The amendment will not involve a significant reduction in margin ofsafety because it only changes all of the references to Senior Vice Presidentin the Technical Specification to Executive Vice President - Nuclear Operations.The position of Executive Vice President - Nuclear Operations encompassesall of the authority and functions formerly performed by the Senior VicePresident. Based on the above, the staff proposes to determine that the amendmentwill not involve a significant hazards determination. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Reference and Documents Department,Penfield Library, State University of New York, Oswego, New York 13126.<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mark Wetterhahn, Esq., Conner andamp; Wetterhahn,Suite 1050, 1747 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra <ITAG tagnum="84">Niagara Mohawk Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-410, Nine Mile PointNuclear Station, Unit No. 2, Scriba, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 13, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment application proposeschanges to Technical Specification 3/4.4.1, Recirculation System, to differentiatebetween recirculation loop drive flow and jet pump loop flow. The currentSpecifications reference recirculation loop flow and do not differentiatebetween recirculation loop drive flow and jet pump loop flow. The proposedchange will provide clarification. The amendment application also proposeschanges to surveillance requirements contained in Section 4.4.1.2. Thechanges are proposed to increase the sensitivity of performance measuringrequirements for determining jet pumps operability and to increase theallowable variance for diffuser-to-lower plenum differential pressure from10 percent to 20 percent. The amendment application also proposes to incorporatefinal values for Reactor Coolant System flow parameters as determined fromStartup Tests. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsiderations if operation of the facility in accordance with a proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.In its January 13, 1989 submittal, the licensee provided the followinganalysis: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>The operation of Nine Mile Point Unit 2, in accordance with the proposedamendment, will not involve a significant increase in the probability orconsequences of an accident evaluated.</T3> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed amendment involves the changing of recirculation loopflow terms to provide the operators a clearer understanding of the TechnicalSpecification requirements. The implementation of a more sentitive methodof determining jet pump operability provides a more reliable indicationof the jet pumps' ability to provide a refloodable volume. The increasein allowable deviation for the differential pressure of any individualjet pump is consistent with the allowable deviation for jet pump flow specifiedin other surveillances. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed amendment provides assurance that the jet pumps are intactand able to contribute to reflood to two-thirds core height. Thus, theconsequences of a recirculation line break are not affected. The increasein loop drive flow for the 100% power, 100% flow operating point is withinthe core flow limit beneath which no unacceptable core flow induced vibrationswere observed. Startup test data has confirmed the previously analyzedthermal power and core flow values required to prevent stratification,as well as minimum forced circulation flow. In summary, operation of NineMile Point Unit 2, in accordance with the proposed amendment, will notinvolve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of anaccident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>The operation of Nine Mile Point Unit 2, in accordance with the proposedamendment, will not create the possibility of a new or different kind ofaccident from any accident previously evaluated.</T3> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Clarification of recirculation loop flow terminology will not changethe Reactor Recirculation System and jet pumps' response to previouslyevaluated accidents. The proposed changes to the performance monitoringcriteria for determining jet pump operability will assure the Reactor RecirculationSystem and jet pumps' response to previously evaluated accidents remainwithin previously evaluated limits of pressure and temperature. The revisedrecirculation loop drive flow is below the limit established for possibleflow induced vibrations. The proposed amendment does not involve any hardwareor operational changes to the plant. Thus, all safety-related systems andcomponents remain within their applicable design limits. In addition, theenvironmental qualification of plant equipment is not adversely affectedby this proposed amendment. Thus, system and component performance is notadversely affected by this change, thereby assuring that the design capabilitiesof those systems and components are not challenged in a manner not previouslyassessed so as to create the possibility of a new or different kind ofaccident from any previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>The operation of Nine Mile Point Unit 2, in accordance with the proposedamendment, will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed changes in recirculation loop flow terminology will notaffect the existing Technical Specification operational limits or systemperformance criteria. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to monitor jet pump loop flow in lieu of totalcore flow provides a more sensitive indication of jet pump degradation.As such, it will provide an increase in the margin of safety provided bythe surveillance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change to the allowable percent deviation from averagenominal values for individual jet pump diffuser-to-lower plenum differentialpressure from 10% to 20% is required to bring this jet pump performancemeasurement into conformance with the performance measurements that arelooking at jet pump loop flows. Jet pump loop flow is the sum of the individualjet pump flows within the loop. Jet pump flow is the square root of thejet pump diffuser-to-plenum differential pressure signal. A 10% deviationfor jet pump loop flow is equivalent to a 20% deviation for jet pump differentialpressure. Therefore, the proposed surveillance criteria for jet pump differentialpressure is consistent with the criteria for jet pump loop flow. Thus,the margin of safety established by these surveillances has not been reduced.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The limit on loop drive flow provides assurance against vessel internalsflow induced vibration. Testing has demonstrated no unacceptable core flowinduced vibration occurs in either loop below 45,000 gpm. Thus, a limitof 41,800 gpm provides adequate assurance against unacceptable flow inducedvibrations and also establishes an equivalent margin of safety. The remainingrecirculation system parameters were confirmed as conservative by startuptest data, and no change to the Technical Specifications or correspondingmargin of safety is required. </ITAG>Based on the above, the staff proposes that the proposed amendment willnot involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Reference and Documents Department,Penfield Library, State University of New York, Oswego, New York 13126.<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mark Wetterhahn, Esq., Conner andamp; Wetterhahn,Suite 1050, 1747 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra <ITAG tagnum="84">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-423, MillstoneNuclear Power Station, Unit No. 3, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 20, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldchange the Millstone Unit 3 Technical Specificatons (TS) to allow storageof fuel with an enrichment of up to 5.0 nominal weight percent U-235 asfollows: (1) Section 1.0, ``Definitions,'' would be changed by adding newTS 1.40 and 1.41 to define the fuel regional storage pattern, (2) A newTS 3/4.9.13 ``Spent Fuel Pool - Reactivity,'' would be added to limit thefuel K<T2>eff</T2> to less than or equal to .95, (3) A new TS 3/4.9.14, ``SpentFuel Pool - Storage Pattern,'' would be added to implement the fuel storagepattern, (4) TS 5.6.1.1, ``Criticality'' would be changed and expandedto address the storage of fuel utilizing a regional storage system, and(5) A new TS 5.6.3, ``Capacity'' would be added to address the use of cellblocking devices in the storage of fuel. In addition to the above, thelicensee has requested that TS 5.6.1.2, be deleted. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Millstone Unit 3 spent fuel racks are designed to limit the effectiveneutron multiplication factor (K<T2>eff</T2>) to less than, or equal to, .95 provided that the stored fuelenrichment is not greater than 3.85 weight percent (w/o) U-235. The licenseehas now proposed to store fuel with an enrichment of up to 5.0 w/o U-235.The increased enrichment would be compensated by use of cell blocking deviceswhich would limit the proximity of high enrichment fuel (up to 5.0 nominalw/o U-235). The Millstone Unit No. 3 spent fuel pool (SFP) storage racks were reanalyzedby Westinghouse utilizing a two-region storage scheme to accommodate anominal 5.0 w/o U-235 fuel. Region I was reanalyzed to show that fresh5.0 w/o (nominal) U-235 fuel can be stored in the racks in a three-out-of-fourstorage scheme. Region II was reanalyzed to take into consideration thechanges in fuel and fission product inventory resulting from depletionin the reactor core of fuel with nominal enrichments up to 5.0 w/o U235.The Region I rack reanalysis was based on maintaining <T2>eff</T2> less than or equal to 0.95 for storage of Westinghouse 17x 17 OFA and STD fuel at a nominal 5.0 w/o U-235 utilizing three-out-of-fourstorage cells in the array. The Region II spent fuel rack reanalysis wasbased on maintaining <T2>eff</T2> less than or equal to 0.95 for storage of Westinghouse 17x 17 OFA and STD fuel at a nominal 5.0 w/o U-235 with an initial enrichment/burnupcombination in the acceptable area of proposed TS Figure 3.9-1 with utilizationof every cell permitted for storage of the fuel assemblies. Title 10 CFR Part 50, Section 50.92 contains standards for determiningwhether a proposed license amendment involves significant hazards considerations.In this regard, the licensee has stated that the proposed changes to theTS do not: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously analyzed. The proposed change qualifies the MillstoneUnit No. 3 SFP racks for an increase in initial fuel enrichment from thecurrent nominal value of 3.8 weight-percent U-235 to a maximum nominalenrichment of 5.0 weight-percent U-235. The increase in the allowed initialfuel enrichment and the subsequent increase in the SFP Cycle 3-specificdecay heat load (due to the burnup and discharge of this fuel) does notadversely impact the results of any previously analyzed accident. </ITAG>In addition, with regard to TS 5.6.1.2, this TS can be deleted since itrestricts the <T2>eff</T2> of first cycle fuel to .98 when stored, dry, in the spentfuel racks. Since the spent fuel pool will remain water-filled for thelife of the facility, the potential overmoderating effects of aqueous fire-fightingfoam, are no longer a concern. <ITAG tagnum="21">2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany previously analyzed accident. Since there are no changes in the waythe plant is operated or in the operation of the equipment credited inthe design basis accidents, the potential for an unanalyzed accident isnot created. Also, no new failure modes are introduced. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The proposedchange qualifies the Millstone Unit No. 3 SFP racks for an increase ininitial fuel enrichment. This increase and the subsequent increase in theSFP Cycle 3-specific decay heat load (due to the burnup and discharge ofthis fuel) does not adversely impact the consequences of any accident previouslyanalyzed; therefore, there is no reduction in the margin of safety. </ITAG>The NRC staff concurs with the licensee's assessment concerning no significanthazards considerations associated with the April 20, 1989 application.Accordingly, the staff has made a proposed determination that the applicationfor amendment involves no significant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waterford Public Library,49 Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry andamp;Howard, One Constitution Plaza, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-275 and 50-323, DiabloCanyon Power Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, San Luis Obispo County, California</ITAG><T3>Dates of amendment request: </T3>February 28, 1989 and April 27, 1988(Reference LAR 89-01) <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the combined Technical Specifications (TS) for the Diablo CanyonPower Plant (DCPP) Unit Nos. 1 and 2 to: (1) Change the description of Plant Staff Review Committee (PSRC) membershipby using functional and organizational description of the PSRC responsibilitiesrather than by formal job title, (2) Specify that the qualifications of each PSRC member shall meet or exceedthe requirements and recommendations of ANSI/ANS 3.1-1978, (3) Increase the PSRC quorum requirements to a majority (more than one-half)of the members of the PSRC, and (4) Revise the review and approval methodology for procedures to allowindependent technically qualified individuals to conduct procedure reviewsinstead of the PSRC. Specific TS changes include the following: TS Section 6.5.1 would be revisedregarding description of PSRC membership, quorum requirements, qualificationsand review responsibilities and would be renumbered to TS Section 6.5.2.;TS Section 6.5.1 would be added regarding the review methodology for procedures;TS Section 6.8 would be revised regarding methodology for procedures. This request was previously noticed in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on May 3, 1989 at 54 FR 18950. This replacesthe previous notice. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a nosignificant hazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c).A proposed amendment to an operating license for a facility involves nosignificant hazards consideration if operation of the facility in accordancewith the proposed amendment would not: (1) involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The licensee, in its submittal of February 28, 1989, evaluated the proposedchanges against the significant hazards criteria of 10 CFR 50.92 and againstthe Commission guidance concerning application of this standard. Basedon the evaluation given below, the licensee has concluded that the proposedchanges do not involve a significant hazards consideration. The licensee'sevaluation is as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21">a. Does the change involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The change regarding the procedures review methodology will not resultin a decrease in the effectiveness of the review methodology and will resultin an equivalent or more effective level of review. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The other proposed changes are administrative in nature, do not affectplant operations, constitute more restrictive requirements, and providegreater assurance of effective performance. These changes are expectedto result in improved administrative practices. Therefore, these proposedchanges will not increase the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Does the change create the possibility of a new or different kindof accident from any accident previously evaluated? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">...[T]here is no physical alteration to any plant system, nor is therea change in the method by which any safety related system performs itsfunction. The proposed changes are administrative in nature, are more restrictiveand, therefore, do not create the possibility of a new or different kindof accident from any previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Does the change involve a significant reduction in the margin ofsafety? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed changes are administrative in nature or are more restrictiveand, therefore, will not reduce any margin of safety. </ITAG>The NRC staff has reviewed the proposed TS changes and the no significanthazards consideration determination provided in the licensee's February28, 1989 submittal and finds them acceptable. The staff has also reviewedthe additional TS changes proposed in the licensee's submittal of April27, 1989 and finds that they do not alter the licensee's no significanthazards consideration determination described above. On this basis, thestaff proposes to determine that these changes do not involve a significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>California Polytechnic StateUniversity Library, Government Documents and Maps Department, San LuisObispo, California 93407. <T3>Attorneys for licensee: </T3>Richard R. Locke, Esq., Pacific Gas andElectric Company, P.O. Box 7442, San Francisco, California 94120 and BruceNorton, Esq., c/o Pacific Gas and Electric Company, P.O. Box 7442, SanFrancisco, California 94120. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>George W. Knighton <ITAG tagnum="84">Pennsylvania Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-387 and 50-388Susquehanna Steam Electric Station, Units 1 and 2, Luzerne County, Pennsylvania</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 14, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed Technical Specificationchanges involve removal of the thermal overload protection bypass capabilityof the diesel generators A through E Emergency Service Water (ESW) Systemvalves and reduction of the battery load profiles for the Diesel GeneratorE 125 v dc battery. The changes will support the modification of the dieselgenerators ESW system valves needed to meet the requirement of 10 CFR Part50 Appendix R. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or(3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The staff has reviewed the licensee's request and concurs with the followingbasis and conclusion provided by the licensee in its April 14, 1989 submittal.<ITAG tagnum="21">I. Does the proposed change involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">No. Since once the auto-loop transfer logic is removed, the DieselGenerator A through D ESW valves no longer have a safety related functionother than maintaining the flow path integrity or an isolation boundarywhen the diesel generator is not aligned. These valves will be open whendiesel generators are aligned and will have no automatic actuation functionsthus the thermal overload protection does not need to be continuously bypassednor does it need the capability of being bypassed. With the auto-loop transferlogic de-energized, the Diesel Generator ``E'' valves' only safety relatedfunction (other than flowpath integrity and isolation boundary) is to automaticallyclose during a LOCA and/or LOOP condition when the diesel generator isnot aligned but is being tested. The Diesel Generator ``E'' ESW loop Bvalves had this auto-close feature incorporated in their design since theirinstallation. The installation of the auto-closure for the loop A valveshas the same basis as for the loop B valves. The Technical Specificationchanges for the loop B valves were approved in Amendment No. 61 for NPF-14and Amendment No. 32 for NPF-22 dated 3/16/87. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">FSAR Subsection 8.3.2.1.1.4 stated that the station batteries havesufficient capacity without the charger to independently supply the requiredloads for four hours. The Technical Specifications require that the batteriesbe surveilled to dummy loads which are greater than design loads. An assessmenthas been performed by our engineering department which verifies that thebattery has adequate capacity to power the actual loads on the 125 v dcsystem. The new load profile contained in the proposed amendment to theTechnical Specifications envelop(e) the actual loads. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. Does the proposed change create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">No. Since the proposed changes do not change the function of the ESWsystem, they will not introduce a new or different kind of event. Any postulatedaccident(s) resulting from these changes are bounded by previous analysis.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A(s) stated in Part I, the batteries have sufficient capacity to powerthe actual battery loads thus enabling them to perform their intended function.Any postulated accident resulting from this change is bounded by previousanalysis. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. Does the proposed change involve a significant reduction in amargin of safety? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">No. Since the diesel generator ESW valves no longer provide an automaticsafety function, the removal of the continuous thermal overload protectionbypass does not reduce a margin of safety. The addition of the auto-closeand automatic thermal overload protection bypass for the Diesel Generator``E'' Loop A ESW valves does not degrade the margin of safety of the ESWsystem or diesel generators. This change has already been approved forthe Loop B ESW valves. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IEEE 485 requires that the related battery capacity include a marginfor aging of the battery and the temperature of the batteries' environmentat the beginning of battery life. This margin allows replacement of thebattery when its capacity is decreased to 80% of its rated capacity (100%design load). Our engineering department has determined that with the revisedreduced load profile the Class 1E 125 (v dc) battery will supply its connectedemergency loads with greater margins of safety at the battery electrolytetemperatures equal to or greater than 60anddegrees; F and with 25% agingmargins relative to load as recommended by IEEE-485-1983. With decreasedbattery loads it can be concluded that the overall safety margin of theplant is not diminished. </ITAG>Based on the above considerations, the Commission proposes to determinethat the proposed changes involve no significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Osterhout Free Library, ReferenceDepartment, 71 South Franklin Street, Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania 18701<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Jay Silberg, Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Pottsand Trowbridge, 2300 N Street NW., Washington, DC 20037 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Walter R. Butler <ITAG tagnum="84">Sacramento Municipal Utility District, Docket No. 50-312, Rancho SecoNuclear Generating Station, Sacramento County, California </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 16, 1986 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise Paragraph 2.C(4) of the license for Rancho Seco Nuclear GeneratingStation. The request is based on the licensee's re-evaluation of fire areasin its 1985 Updated Fire Hazards Analysis, which no longer requires someof the fire doors and dampers required by the Savety Evaluation referencedin Paragraph 2.C(4). Specifically, the proposed amendment would reviseParagraphs 3.1.5(1), 3.1.30(1), 3.1.25(1) and 3.1.40(5) of the referencedSafety Evaluation such that certain fire doors and dampers would no longerbe required due to revised fire boundaries. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; (2) Create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident than previously evaluated; or (3) Involvea significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has determined that the proposed change will not: (1) Involvea significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated because the changes in fire loadings are not significant.The revised fire boundaries included in the 1985 Rancho Seco Updated FireHazards Analysis no longer require the affected doors and dampers. (2)Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated because the affected doors and dampers eitherno longer penetrate fire boundaries or by other means preclude a fire frompropagating to other fire areas. (3) Involve a significant reduction inthe margin of safety because based on the fire loadings and the fire boundariesused for the affected areas, the fire would be contained in the area andsafe shutdown equipment in other fire areas would be adequately protected.Accordingly, the licensee has determined that the proposed changes to thelicense conditions of the Rancho Seco License involve no significant hazardsconsideration. The NRC staff has reviewed the proposed amendment and the licensee's determinationand find them acceptable. Therefore, the staff proposes to determine thatthe amendment request does not involve a significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Martin Luther King RegionalLibrary, 7430 24th Street Bypass, Sacramento, California 95822. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>David S. Kaplan, Sacramento Municipal UtilityDistrict, 6201 S Street, P. O. Box 15830, Sacramento, California 95813.<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>George W. Knighton <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-259, 50-260 and 50-296,Browns Ferry Nuclear Plant, Units 1, 2 and 3, Limestone County, Alabama</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>January 13, 1989 (TS 256) <T3>Description of amendment requests: </T3>The proposed technical specification(TS) for Browns Ferry, Units 1, 2 and 3 would delete the current surveillanceperformed on redundant but independent systems when a system is declaredinoperable. For example, the current TS require that should one core spraysystem (CSS) loop become inoperable, the remaining CSS loop, the residualheat removal (RHR) system, and the associated diesel generator are requiredto be operable. The current TS surveillance requires that the other CSSloop shall be demonstrated operable immediately (i.e., tested) and dailythereafter until the inoperable CSS loop is either declared operable orthe reactor is shut down. The change would delete these type of requirementsfrom the following systems: CSS, RHR, residual heat removal service water(RHRSW), emergency equipment cooling water (EECW), reactor core injectioncooling (RCIC), and automatic depressurization system (ADS). A surveillanceto verify the alignment of valves in the injection/safety related flowpaths is added. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). 10 CFR 50.91requires that at the time a licensee requests an amendment, it must provideto the Commission its analyses, using the standards in Section 50.92, onthe issue of no significant hazards consideration. Therefore, in accordancewith 10 CFR 50.91 and 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee has performed and providedthe following analysis. <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed change does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The current technical specifications require additional surveillancetesting be conducted on redundant systems when a system or portion of asystem is declared inoperable. This amendment deletes the additional surveillancetesting requirements for redundant operable systems when an LCO is entered.The intended function of the existing testing requirement will be servedinstead by performance of periodic ASME Section XI tests coupled with monthlyvalve alignment checks. The ASME Section XI testing has been previouslysubmitted for the BFN units 1, 2, and 3 technical specifications by technicalspecification amendment number 235. The removal of the additional surveillancetesting from the technical specifications would decrease the probabilityof equipment failure because the excessive testing will cause unnecessarywear on the safety related equipment and unnecessary challenges to thesafety systems. Also, the probability of human error will decrease as aresult of removing the excessive testing. Human error such as misalignmentof valves after the system is returned to this normal configuration followingtesting, and the misdirection of the operators' attention from monitoringand directing plant operations becomes less probable if this testing isnot performed. Removing the excessive scope and frequency of surveillancetesting, many of which are not required on a daily basis during LCO's,will actually decrease the probability of equipment failure which couldrequire plant shutdown. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. This change does not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The reduction of surveillance testing on redundant systems when theECCS and RCIC systems enter an LCO will reduce the probability of equipmentfailure and human error. The deletion of this additional surveillance testingwill not reduce the ability of redundant systems to mitigate a design basisaccident. Therefore, the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentis not created. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. This change does not involve significant reduction in a marginof safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This technical specification change will not reduce the required equipmentduring an LCO or normal operating conditions given in the technical specificationsbasis for the residual heat removal, high pressure coolant injection, corespray, residual heat removal service water, emergency equipment coolingwater, fill maintenance or automatic depressurization systems. The reductionin testing will decrease the probability of equipment failure and humanerror. Therefore, the margin of safety for the systems and the equipmentcontained in these systems will not be significantly reduced. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Since the application for amendment involves proposed changes thatare encompassed by the criteria for which no significant hazards considerationexists, TVA has made a proposed determination that the application involvesno significant hazards consideration. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Therefore, the staffproposes to determine that the application for amendments involves no significanthazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Athens Public Library, SouthStreet, Athens, Alabama 35611. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902. <T3>NRC Assistant Director: </T3>Suzanne Black <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>April 17, 1989 (TS 89-16) <T3>Description of amendment requests: </T3>The Tennessee Valley Authority(TVA) proposes to modify Section 6, Administrative Controls, of the SequoyahNuclear Plant (SQN), Units 1 and 2, Technical Specification (TS). The proposedchanges are to revise Specifications 6.2.3.2 and 6.2.3.4 to reflect thecurrent restructuring of TVA's nuclear power organization. The proposedadministrative change specifically addresses the Independent Safety EngineeringGroup (ISEG) with regard to site and corporate staffing and the corporateofficial to whom ISEG makes recommendations. The ISEG would provide itsrecommendations to the Manager of the Nuclear Manager's Review Group insteadof the current Director of Nuclear Licensing and Regulatory Affairs. Inaddition, TVA is proposing to rename ISEG to Independent Safety Engineering(ISE). <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>TVA provided the following information in its application to supportthe proposed changes: <ITAG tagnum="21">The organizational changes within the management structure of TVA'snuclear power organization have been made to consolidate independent oversightand assessment functions. This organizational realignment would place ISEwithin the Nuclear Manager's Review Group under the newly formed NuclearAssurance and Services organization. TS 6.2.3.4 currently requires thatISEG make their recommendations to the Director of Nuclear Licensing andRegulatory Affairs. TVA's stated reorganization would, therefore, requirethat specification 6.2.3.4 be revised to indicate the new corporate officialto whom ISE would make recommendations. This corporate official would beentitled Manager of the Nuclear Manager's Review Group. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">An additional proposed change has been made to the composition ofISE with regard to staffing of full-time engineers among TVA's nuclearsites. This change to specification 6.2.3.2 clarifies staffing requirementsif more than 3 engineers are assigned full-time at both SQN and BrownsFerry Nuclear Plant sites. The manager of ISE would be located at TVA'scorporate office and would serve a generic function to support both TVAsites. The combined manpower would continue to provide a total of fivededicated full-time employees within ISE. </ITAG>The Commission has provided Standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). 10 CFR 50.91requires that at the time a licensee requests an amendment, it must provideto the Commission its analyses, using the standards in Section 50.92, onthe issue of no significant hazards consideration. Therefore, in accordancewith 10 CFR 50.91 and 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee has provided the followinganalysis: <ITAG tagnum="21">TVA has evaluated the proposed TS change and has determined that itdoes not represent a significant hazards consideration based on criteriaestablished in 10 CFR 50.92(c). Operation of SQN in accordance with theproposed amendment will not: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The proposed changes to the ISEG staffingrequirements and the title of the corporate official to whom ISEG makesrecommendations has not affected the safe operation of SQN. These changesare administrative in nature and serve to reflect recent organizationalchanges within TVA's nuclear power program. Since the proposed amendmenthas not resulted in any changes to hardware, procedures, or the safetyanalysis report, the probability or consequences of an accident previouslyevaluated has not been increased. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously analyzed. The proposed change to specification 6.2.3.2revises ISEG onsite and corporate staffing requirements. These staffingchanges continue to provide a total of five dedicated full-time engineerswithin ISEG. The proposed change to specification 6.2.3.4 provides a changein the corporate official to whom ISEG makes recommendations. These changesare administrative changes that reflect realignment of the management structurewithin TVA's nuclear power organization. The proposed amendment does notinvolve a physical change to the facility; therefore, no new or differentkind of accident is created. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposedrevision to administrative specifications 6.2.3.2 and 6.2.3.4 reflectscurrent restructuring of TVA's nuclear power organization. These changesin no way affect the physical facility design or safe operation of SQN.The function of ISEG continues to conform with NUREG-0737 requirementsfor performing [an] independent review of plant activities. Because compliancewith the regulatory requirements has not been compromised and because thesechanges did not alter the facility or its design, there is no reductionin the margin of safety. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Therefore, the staffproposes to determine that the application for amendments involves no significanthazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902. <T3>NRC Assistant Director: </T3>Suzanne Black <ITAG tagnum="84">Toledo Edison Company and The Cleveland Electric Illuminating Company,Docket No. 50-346, Davis-Besse Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 1, OttawaCounty, Ohio </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 2, 1987 and January 5, 1989.<T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldcorrect typographical errors and make minor word changes to achieve consistencybetween the Technical Specifications and plant nomenclature. It would alsodelete certain statements which are no longer necessary because of elapsedtime and/or completion of specified actions. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards in 10 CFR 50.92(c) for determiningwhether a significant hazards consideration exists. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has evaluated the proposed changes to correct typographicalerrors and make minor word changes to achieve consistency between the TechnicalSpecifications and plant nomenclature and to delete certain statementswhich are no longer necessary against the standards provided above andhas determined that the changes would have no significant hazards considerationbecause they are strictly administrative in nature. The staff agrees withthis evaluation. The Commission has provided examples (51 FR 7751) of amendments that arenot likely to involve significant hazards considerations. One of theseexamples, (i), states: ``A purely administrative change to the technicalspecifications: for example, a change to achieve consistency throughoutthe technical specifications, correction of an error, or a change in nomenclature.''The proposed correction of typographical errors and minor wording changesto achieve consistency are administrative in nature and therefore are similarto example (i). Based on the above, the staff proposes to determine that the proposed amendmentwould involve no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of Toledo Library,Documents Department, 2801 Bancroft Avenue, Toledo, Ohio 43606. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Charnoff, Esquire, Shaw, Pittman,Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John N. Hannon <ITAG tagnum="84">Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-280 and 50-281,Surry Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Surry County, Virginia </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>April 6, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment requests: </T3>The proposed Technical Specifications(TS) changes would modify the requirement for dry rotation testing of theinside recirculation spray pumps (IRSP) from monthly to quarterly, andadd a requirement to perform full flow testing of the IRSP each refuelingoutage. In addition, the proposed amendments will require a visual inspectionof the containment sumps each refueling outage and after major maintenanceof the ISRP to verify sump component integrity and the absence of foreigndebris. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has reviewed the proposed changes in accordance with the requirementsof 10 CFR 50.92 and has determined that the request does not involve significanthazards considerations in that: <ITAG tagnum="21">1) The implementation of these proposed changes [does] not significantlyincrease the probability of occurrence or the consequences of an accidentor malfunction of equipment important to safety and previously evaluatedin the Updated Final Safety Analysis Report (USFAR). The changes continueto require functional testing for operability in accordance with ASME SectionXI as modified by our IST Program Relief Request. Although the frequencyfor dry testing the Inside Recirculation Spray Pumps has been reduced toquarterly, performing the dynamic flow testing of the pumps each refuelingoutage provides empirical data to directly evaluate pump performance andoperability. In addition, the proposed reduction in dry pump testing, incombination with planned maintenance to overhaul the pumps every five years,reduces the potential for any significant pump bearing degradation. Likewise,the proposed change to formally require visual inspection of containmentsumps every refueling outage specifically reduces the potential for foreigndebris in the sumps which could lead to pump and/or associated system performancedegradation. Therefore, a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident has not been created by these proposed changes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2) The implementation of these proposed changes [does] not createa possibility for an accident or a malfunction of a different type thanany evaluated previously in the UFSAR. Pump testing continues in accordancewith ASME Section XI requirements and current NRC approved practices. [Inasmuch]as the proposed changes only define surveillance testing requirements,they do not create new or different kinds of accidents. Additionally, theproposed change for sump visual inspections is specifically made to precludethe possibility of system degradation associated with foreign debris whichmay result in a malfunction different than that previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3) The implementation of these proposed changes [does] not significantlyreduce the margin of safety as defined in the basis of any Technical Specification.Testing and operability requirements are established in accordance withASME Section XI and the Technical Specifications. No assumptions used inthe UFSAR Chapter 14 accident analysis are affected by these proposed changes.</ITAG>Based on the staff's review of the licensee's analysis, the staff agreeswith the licensee's conclusions as stated above. Therefore, the staff proposesto determine that the proposed amendments do not involve significant hazardsconsiderations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Swem Library, College ofWilliam and Mary, Williamsburg, Virginia 23185. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Michael W. Maupin, Esq., Hunton and Williams,Post Office Box 1535, Richmond, Virginia 23213. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Herbert N. Berkow <ITAG tagnum="84">Wisconsin Electric Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-266 and 50-301, PointBeach Nuclear Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Town of Two Creeks, Manitowoc County,Wisconsin </ITAG><T3>Date of amendments request: </T3>March 17, 1989 <T3>Description of amendments request: </T3>The amendment would reviseTechnical Specification 15.2.3.1.B(5) to eliminate the f-delta-I function(function of neutron flux difference between upper and lower core) fromthe overpower delta-T (OPDT) setpoint to increase the flexibility of operationat full power by allowing use of the full flux difference operating envelope.The request would also change the associated TS bases for this specification.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendment to anoperating license involves no significant hazards consideration if operationof the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment would not: (1)involve a significant increase in the probability or consequence of anaccident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or (3) involvea significant reduction in the margin of safety. The proposed amendment would remove the f-delta-I function from the OPDTsetpoint described in TS 15.2.3.1.B(5) to increase the flexibility of plantoperation at full power. Additionally, the associated TS bases for thisspecification would be modified to remove the correction for axial powerdistribution, since the setpoint would no longer require this correction.The design bases of the OPDT are presented in the report WCAP-8745-P-A,``Design Bases for the Thermal Overpower Delta-T and the Thermal OvertemperatureDelta-T Trip Functions,'' dated September 1986. This report was acceptedfor referencing by the NRC in a safety evaluation dated April 17, 1986.The licensee references this report in its evaluation of the proposed nosignificant hazards consideration. The proposed amendment revising the OPDT setpoint calculation will notsignificantly increase the probability or consequences of an accident previouslyanalyzed. The OPDT setpoint helps to ensure that the core safety limitsare not violated. These limits are used to determine the acceptabilityof the consequences of certain design basis events and as such have noeffect on the probability of those events occurring. Analysis of ConditionII events for control bank and dilution/boration system malfunctions withoutthe f-delta-I penalty included in the OPDT setpoint confirmed that theresulting overpower conditions did not yield a linear power density thatwould cause fuel centerline melting. The core safety limits will not beadversely impacted and there will be no significant increase in the consequencesof a previously evaluated accident. The proposed amendment does not involve any physical modifications to thePoint Beach nuclear cores, but instead involves a minor change to the OPDTsetpoint calculation. Therefore, the proposed change cannot create thepossibility for a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated. The proposed change will not alter the core safety limits, and analysishas shown that the core safety limits will not be exceeded as a resultof the change. The purpose of the OPDT setpoint is to ensure that the coresafety limits prevent fuel centerline melting. The removal of the f-delta-Ifrom the setpoint equation will not impact this purpose. Therefore, thisdoes not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. Based on the above information, the staff proposes to determine that theproposed change to the TS does not involve a significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Joseph P. Mann Library, 1516Sixteenth Street, Two Rivers, Wisconsin. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Charnoff, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsand Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John N. Hannon. <ITAG tagnum="84">Wolf Creek Nuclear Operating Corporation, Docket No. 50-482, WolfCreek Generating Station, Coffey County, Kansas </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 13, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The license amendment requestproposes to revise Technical Specifications 3.1.3.4 and Figure 3.1-1 tochange the fully withdrawn position of the Rod Cluster Control Assembliesfor Wolf Creek Generating Station to a range of 222 to 231 steps inclusive.Wolf Creek Generating Station (WCGS) Technical Specifications require allshutdown rods to be fully withdrawn and all control rod banks to be withdrawnin accordance with Figure 3.1-1. Past operational history at WCGS has shownthat long periods of operation with the control rods withdrawn to 228 stepshas led to control rod wear by fretting against the upper internals guidesurface due to flow induced vibration. In order to minimize the effectof this control rod wear, axial repositioning of the control rods can beused to eliminate further degradation at locations where control rod wearhas been observed. This Technical Specification change would allow axialrepositioning between 222 steps and 231 steps withdrawn. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with a proposedamendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated, (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated,or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has provided the following analysis of no significant hazardsconsiderations using the Commission's standards. <ITAG tagnum="21">This license amendment request will allow axial repositioning of thecontrol rods to minimize the effect of control rod wear by eliminatingfurther degradation at locations at which wear has been observed. The probabilityand consequences of accidents and transients previously evaluated in theUpdated Safety Analysis Report, including LOCA and non-LOCA events, havebeen evaluated and/or reanalyzed and are not affected by the proposed changes.Therefore, the proposed changes would not involve an increase in the probabilityof occurrence of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed Technical Specification changes do not create any newfailure modes from those assumed in the accident analyses. The accidentsassumed to occur at the previous fully withdrawn position are the sameas those for the proposed position range of 222 to 231 steps. No changesto the operation of the control rod drive mechanism are associated withthe change. Therefore, the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentwould not be created by the proposed changes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed Technical Specification changes do not affect the roddrop time limit or the control rod bank and rod insertion limits. The affectedsafety analyses have been evaluated, and it has been determined that allapplicable safety criteria are met with no significant adverse affectson analyses results. Therefore, the margin of safety as defined by theUSAR, safety analyses, and the Technical Specification Bases would notbe significantly reduced. </ITAG>Based on the previous discussion, the licensee concluded that the proposedamendment request does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;nor involve a significant reduction in the required margin of safety. TheNRC staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. The staff has, therefore,made a proposed determination that the licensee's request does not involvea significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room Location: </T3>Emporia State University,William Allen White Library, 1200 Commercial Street, Emporia, Kansas 66801and Washburn University School of Law Library, Topeka, Kansas 66621 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Jay Silberg, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsand Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Jose A. Calvo <ITAG tagnum="84">Yankee Atomic Electric Company Docket No. 50-029 Yankee Nuclear PowerStation, Franklin County, Massachusetts </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>April 14, 1989. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment is acompletely new section of the Control Room Emergency Air Cleaning Systemtechnical specification. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license involves no significant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequenceof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee's analyses contained in the April 14, 1989 letter states thefollowing: <ITAG tagnum="21">This change is requested in order to ensure, through operability andsurveillance requirements, the enhanced protection afforded Control Roompersonnel by the Control Room Emergency Air Cleaning System (CREACS). Insubmitting the CREACS single filter train conceptual design to the USNRC,by letters dated February 4, 1982, and February 26, 1982, additional provisionswere provided to ensure the reliability of the Filter System. These provisionsprovided for both a quick filter change-out capability as well as havingon hand an entire filter media reload. Given these additional provisions,the USNRC found the design of Yankee's CREACS to be acceptable in theirletter of May 28, 1982. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The enhanced protection afforded ControlRoom personnel would further assure their ability to mitigate such accidents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany previously analyzed. The operational and surveillance requirementsof the proposed change will not affect the Control Room environment, therebyassuring the continued operation of both personnel and equipment and thuswill not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously analyzed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposedchange shall assure the margin of safety afforded Control Room personnelis maintained through its operability and surveillance requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Based on the consideration contained herein, it is concluded thatthere is reasonable assurance that operation of the Yankee plant, consistentwith the proposed Technical Specification, will not endanger the healthand safety of the public. This proposed change has been reviewed by theNuclear Safety Audit and Review Committee. </ITAG>Based on the discussion above, it is concluded that there is reasonableassurance that operation of the Yankee plant, consistent with the proposedTechnical Specifications, will not endanger the health and safety of thepublic. The proposed change has been reviewed by the Nuclear Safety Auditand Review Committee. The staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and agrees with it. Therefore,we conclude that the amendment satisfies the three criteria listed in 10CFR 50.92. Based on that conclusion the staff proposes to make a no significanthazards consideration determination. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Greenfield Community College,1 College Drive, Greenfield, Massachusetts 01301. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Thomas Dignan, Esquire, Ropes and Gray,225 Franklin Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02110. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Richard H. Wessman <ITAG tagnum="84">PREVIOUSLY PUBLISHED NOTICES OF CONSIDERATION OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENTSTO OPERATING LICENSES AND PROPOSED NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATIONDETERMINATION AND OPPORTUNITY FOR HEARING </ITAG>The following notices were previously published as separate individualnotices. The notice content was the same as above. They were publishedas individual notices either because time did not allow the Commissionto wait for this biweekly notice or because the action involved exigentcircumstances. They are repeated here because the biweekly notice listsall amendments issued or proposed to be issued involving no significanthazards consideration. For details, see the individual notice in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on the day and page cited. This notice does notextend the notice period of the original notice. <ITAG tagnum="84">Arkansas Power andamp; Light Company, Docket No. 50-313, Arkansas NuclearOne, Unit 1, (ANO-1) Pope County, Arkansas </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment would changethe ANO-1 license condition to increase the authorized steady state reactorcore power levels to a maximum of 2054 megawatts thermal (80% of full power).<T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 28, 1989 (54 FR 18365) <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>Comment period expired May15, 1989; Notice period expires May 30, 1989. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Tomlinson Library, ArkansasTech University, Russellville, Arkansas 72801 <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-295 and 50-304, Zion NuclearPower Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Lake County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 17, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment is being proposedin accordance with Generic Letter 85-09, entitled ``Technical Specificationsfor Generic Letter 83-28, Items 4.3,'' to change Tables 3.1-1 and 4.1-1of Technical Specifications for Zion Station. The proposed changes involveaddition and/or clarifications to the operability and surveillance requirementsfor: (1) Manual Reactor Trip; (2) Automatic Reactor Trip Logic; and (3)Reactor Trip and Bypass Breakers. <T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 28, 1989 (54 FR 18367) <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>May 30, 1989 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waukegan Public Library,128 N. County Street, Waukegan, Illinois 60085. <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-369 and 50-370, McGuire NuclearStation, Units 1 and 2, Mecklenburg County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>February 17, 1987, as supplementedNovebmer 19, 1987, and April 1 and October 3, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendmentswould make editorial, administrative, or other minor changes to add clarification,consistency, and conciseness to the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 4, 1989 (54 FR 19268) <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>June 5, 1989 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Atkins Library, Universityof North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223. <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-369 and 50-370, McGuire NuclearStation, Units 1 and 2, Mecklenburg County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>March 9, 1987, as revised March 20,1989. <T3>Brief description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendmentswould relocate fire protection requirements from the operating licensesand the Technical Specifications to the Final Safety Analysis Report. <T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 4, 1989 (54 FR 19266) <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>June 5, 1989 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Atkins Library, Universityof North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223. <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>February 14, 1986 <T3>Brief description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment would makeadministrative changes to the Technical Specifications (TS) to achieveconsistency, remove outdated material, make minor text changes, and correcterrors. <T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 27, 1989 (54 FR 18176) <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>May 30, 1989 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Public Service Electric and Gas Company,Delmarva Power and Light Company, and Atlantic City Electric Company, DocketNos. 50-277 and 50-278, Peach Bottom Atomic Power Station, Unit Nos. 2and 3, York County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>October 17, 1986 <T3>Brief description of amendment request: </T3>Delete certain thermaleffluent monitoring requirements from the Environmental Technical Specificationsin view of the issuance of the National Pollutant Discharge EliminationSystem (NPDES) permit by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania. <T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 27, 1989 (54 FR 18179) <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>May 30, 1989 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Government Publications Section,State Library of Pennsylvania, Education Building, Commonwealth and WalnutStreets, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17126. <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Service Electric andamp; Gas Company, Docket Nos. 50-272 and50-311, Salem Generating Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Salem County, NewJersey </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 18, 1986 <T3>Brief description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendmentwould revise the Action Statements for the Reactor Trip System for Modes3, 4 and 5 with the reactor trip breakers closed and would explicitly addressthe operable requirements of the diverse trip features as requested inGeneric Letter 85-09. <T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 27, 1989 (54 FR 18183) <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>May 30, 1989 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Salem Free Public Library,112 West Broadway, Salem, New Jersey 08079. <ITAG tagnum="84">Sacramento Municipal Utility District, Docket No. 50-312, Rancho SecoNuclear Generating Station, Sacramento County, California </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 10, l988, as revised January 11,1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The proposed amendment would reviseTechnical Specifications (TS) 4.21, ``Liquid Effluents,'' TS 4.22 ``GaseousEffluents,'' and TS 4.26, ``Radiological Environmental Monitoring,'' toeffect operational enhancements to the liquid radiological effluent technicalspecifications. <T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 24, 1989 (54 FR 16438) <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>May 24, 1989 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Martin Luther King RegionalLibrary, 7340 24th Street Bypass, Sacramento, California 95822 <ITAG tagnum="84">Wisconsin Public Service Corporation, Docket No. 50-305, KewauneeNuclear Power Plant, Kewaunee County, Wisconsin </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>May 23, 1986 <T3>Brief description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment would changethe expiration date for the Kewaunee Plant Operating License from August6, 2008, to December 21, 2013. The Technical Specifications for the plantwould not be affected. <T3>Date of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 25, 1989 (54 FR 17849). <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>May 25, 1989. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of Wisconsin LibraryLearning Center, 2420 Nicolet Drive, Green Bay, Wisconsin 54301. <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATING LICENSE </ITAG>During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commissionhas issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined foreach of these amendments that the application complies with the standardsand requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commission has made appropriatefindings as required by the Act and the Commission's rules and regulationsin 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the license amendment. Notice of Consideration of Issuance of Amendment to Facility OperatingLicense and Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determinationand Opportunity for Hearing in connection with these actions was publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>as indicated. No request for a hearing or petitionfor leave to intervene was filed following this notice. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendmentssatisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impactstatement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments.If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the specialcircumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determinationbased on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applicationsfor amendments, (2) the amendments, and (3) the Commission's related letters,Safety Evaluations and/or Environmental Assessments as indicated. All ofthese items are available for public inspection at the Commission's PublicDocument Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC,and at the local public document rooms for the particular facilities involved.A copy of items (2) and (3) may be obtained upon request addressed to theU.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Director,Division of Reactor Projects. <ITAG tagnum="84">Alabama Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-348 and 50-364, Joseph M. FarleyNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Houston County, Alabama. </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>December 14, 1988, as supplementedApril 6, 1989. <T3>Description of amendments: </T3>The amendments change the TechnicalSpecifications to incorporate provisions for the reactor vessel level indicatingsystem (RVLIS) into TS 3/4.3.3.8, ``Accident Monitoring Instrumentation.''In addition, an editorial change has been made for Unit 1 to remove theone-time change approved in Amendment No. 34. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 4, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 4, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>80 and 72 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-2 and NPF-8. </T3>Amendments revisethe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>January 11, 1989 (54 FR 1019). The April 6,1989 letter provided clarifying information that did not change the initialdetermination of no significant hazards consideration as published in the<T4>Federal Register. </T4>The Commission's related evaluation of the amendmentis contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 4, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>George S. Houston MemorialLibrary, 212 W. Burdeshaw Street, Dothan, Alabama 36303. <ITAG tagnum="84">Arkansas Power andamp; Light Company, Docket No. 50-368, Arkansas NuclearOne, Unit 2, Pope County, Arkansas </ITAG><T3>Date of applications for amendment: </T3>December 12, 1986 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment eliminates the ArkansasNuclear One, Unit 2 Technical Specifications which required plant shutdownupon the occurences of iodine spikes in the reactor coolant. It also modifiesreporting requirements for such iodine spikes in accordance with GenericLetter 85-19. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>92 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-6. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 20, 1987 (52 FR 18973). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 24, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Tomlinson Library, ArkansasTech University, Russellville, Arkansas 72801. <ITAG tagnum="84">Arkansas Power andamp; Light Company, Docket No. 50-368, Arkansas NuclearOne, Unit 2, Pope County, Arkansas </ITAG><T3>Date of applications for amendment: </T3>December 12, 1986 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment deletes a conditionin the Arkansas Nuclear One, Unit 2 license which required the licenseeto complete verification tests for the Combustion Engineering Systems ExcursionCode (CESEC). <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>93 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-6. </T3>Amendment revised the operatinglicense. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 20, 1987 (52 FR 18972). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 25, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Tomlinson Library, ArkansasTech University, Russellville, Arkansas 72801. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-325 and50-324, Brunswick Steam Electric Plant, Units 1 and 2, Brunswick County,North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>August 3, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The amendments changed the TechnicalSpecifications to require the use of the Banked Position Withdrawal Sequence(BPWS) as the Rod Worth Minimizer (RWM) Control Rod Program in TechnicalSpecification (TS) 3/4.1.4 ``Control Rod Program Controls.'' In addition,the word ``Operational'' was placed before the word ``Condition'' in TS3/4.1.4. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 19, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 19, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>127 and 157 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-71 and DPR-62. </T3>Amendmentsrevise the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>The Commission's related evaluation of the amendmentsis contained in a Safety Evaluation dated April 19, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-325 and50-324, Brunswick Steam Electric Plant, Units 1 and 2, Brunswick County,North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>October 24, 1984, as supplementedFebruary 27, 1985, July 8, 1985 and March 17, 1987. <T3>Description of amendments: </T3>The amendments change the limitingcondition for operation (LCO) and surveillance requirements for TS 3/4.6.1.3,Primary Containment Air Locks, to address the air lock door interlocksspecifically. Additionally, the Technical Specifications (TS) for air lockswould be reformatted to follow more closely the guidance of NUREG-0123,Standard Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>128 and 158 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-71 and DPR-62. </T3>Amendmentsrevise the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notices in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 27, 1985 (50 FR 12139); August 27, 1985(50 FR 34934); and September 23, 1987 (52 FR 35786). The Commission's relatedevaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation datedApril 25, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-325 and50-324, Brunswick Steam Electric Plant, Units 1 and 2, Brunswick County,North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>September 19, 1988 <T3>Description of amendments: </T3>The amendments revise the action associatedwith TS 3/4.6.4 (Drywell Suppression Chamber - Vacuum Breakers) to clarifythe alternative actions to be taken if the existing actions cannot be taken.Specifically, existing action 3.6.4.1.d will be incorporated into actions3.6.4.1.a, 3.6.4.1.b., and 3.6.4.1.c and present action 3.6.4.1.d willbe deleted, to clarify that in the event any of these action statementsapply, the unit will be placed in hot shutdown within twelve hours andin cold shutdown within the next twenty-four hours. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>129 and 159 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-71 and DPR-62. </T3>Amendmentsrevise the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 8, l989 (54 FR 9915). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 24, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-400, ShearonHarris Nuclear Power Plant, Unit 1, Wake and Chatham Counties, North Carolina</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 4, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changes to the ShearonHarris Nuclear Power Plant, Unit 1 (Harris), Technical Specifications (TS),Section 3.3.3.7, ``Chlorine Detection Systems,'' Limiting Condition forOperation (LCO) and the associated Surveillance Requirement (SR) 4.7.6.d.5.The proposed amendment deletes TS 3.3.3.7, ``Chlorine Detection Systems,''LCO and the associated SR 4.7.6.d.5. The requested change is based on theremoval of onsite liquid chlorine in substantial quantities and the lowprobability of accidental release of chlorine gas from transported offsitesources. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 3, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 3, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>10 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-63. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 22, 1989 (54 FR 7626). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated May 3, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Cameron Village RegionalLibrary, 1930 Clark Avenue, Raleigh, North Carolina 27605. <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-454 and 50-455, ByronStation, Units 1 and 2, Ogle County, Illinois; Docket Nos. 50-456 and 50-457,Braidwood Station Units 1 and 2, Will County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>February 17, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments remove the organizationalfigures from the Technical Specifications, change several position titles,clarify the distribution requirements for onsite reviews, and correct severaltypographical and editorial errors. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>27 for Byron and 16 for Braidwood <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-37, NPF-66, NPF-72, and NPF-77:</T3>The amendments revised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 15, 1989 (54 FR 10759). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 24, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>For Byron Station, the RockfordPublic Library, 215 N. Wyman Street, Rockford, Illinois 61101; for BraidwoodStation, the Wilmington Township Public Library, 201 S. Kankakee Street,Wilmington, Illinois 60481. <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-373 and 50-374, LaSalleCounty Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, LaSalle County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>February 17, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments revise the LaSalleCounty Station, Units 1 and 2 Technical Specifications by changes to theAdministrative Controls Section 6.0 to include removal of the organizationalfigures, a position change from Radiation Chemistry Technician to RadiationProtection Technician, several position title changes and a clarificationto the distribution requirements for Onsite Reviews. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 27, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 27, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>66 and 47 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-11 and NPF-18. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 15, 1989 (54 FR 10762). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 27, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Public Library of IllinoisValley Community College, Rural Route No. 1, Oglesby, Illinois 61348. <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-254 and 50-265, Quad CitiesNuclear Power Station, Units 1 and 2, Rock Island County, Illinois andDocket Nos. 50-237 and 50-249, Dresden Nuclear Power Station, Units 2 and3, Grundy County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>February 17 and 21, 1989 andsupplemented March 20, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments delete the organizationcharts from Technical Specifications (TS) in accordance with guidance givenby Generic Letter 88-06. Additionally, on-site and off-site position titles,descriptions, responsibilities, and lines of authority identified in TSSection 6 were revised to reflect CECo's planned reorganization. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 26, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 26, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>117 and 113 for Quad Cities and 105 and 100 forDresden <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-29, DPR-30, DPR-19 and DPR-25:</T3>Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 15, 1989 (54 FR 10761). The Commission'srelated evaluation of these amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 26, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Dixon Public Library, 221Hennepin Avenue, Dixon, Illinois 61021 and Morris Public Library, 604 LibertyStreet, Morris, Illinois 60450. <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-295 and 50-304, Zion NuclearPower Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Lake County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>February 22, 1989, supplementedMarch 22, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments revise AdministrativeControls Section of the Technical Specifications for Zion units to reflectthe guidance provided by Generic Letter 88-06 and the recent corporateand station reorganizations. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 27, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 27, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>115 and 104 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-39 and DPR-48. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 15, 1989 (54 FR 10764). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 27, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waukegan Public Library,128 N. County Street, Waukegan, Illinois 60085. <ITAG tagnum="84">Connecticut Yankee Atomic Power Company, Docket No. 50-213, HaddamNeck Plant, Middlesex County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 2, 1986, as supplementedNovember 17, 1987, October 12, 1988 and January 24, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment modified paragraph2.C.(5) of the license to require compliance with the amended PhysicalSecurity Plan. This Plan was amended to conform to the requirements of10 CFR 73.55. Consistent with the provisions of 10 CFR 73.55, search requirementsmust be implemented within 60 days and miscellaneous amendments within160 days from the effective date of this amendment. <T3>Date of Issuance: </T3>April 21, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 21, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>113 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-61. </T3>Amendment revised the License.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 22, 1989 (54 FR 11835). The Commission'srelated evaluation of this amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 21, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Russell Library, 123 BroadStreet, Middletown, Connecticut 06457. <ITAG tagnum="84">Connecticut Yankee Atomic Power Company, Docket No. 50-213, HaddamNeck Plant, Middlesex County, Connecticut; Northeast Nuclear Energy Companyet al, Docket Nos. 50-245/336/423, Millstone Nuclear Power Station UnitNos. 1, 2, and 3, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 12, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment to the TechnicalSpecifications (TS) adds a new requirement to TS Section 6.7, ``SafetyLimit Violation.'' This requirement will state that if any safety limitis exceeded ``operation shall not be resumed until authorized by the Commission.''This change makes the TS for the four plants consistent with the requirementsof 10 CFR 50.36, ``Technical Specifications.'' In addition, an amendment to the Millstone Unit No. 3 TS changes the requirementfor auditing TS compliance from all provisions in each section to provisionin each section, each year, during the five-year audit cycle for this plant.This change will make the Millstone Unit No. 3 TS consistent with the TSof the other three plants. <T3>Date of Issuance: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>114, 30, 141, 33 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-61, DPR-21, DPR-65, and NPF-49.</T3>Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 8, 1989 (54 FR 6187). The Commission'srelated evaluation of this amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 25, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Russell Library, 123 BroadStreet, Middletown, Connecticut 06457 and Waterford Public Library, 49Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385. <ITAG tagnum="84">Dairyland Power Cooperative, Docket No. 50-409, La Crosse BoilingWater Reactor, La Crosse, Wisconsin </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 21, 1987 as revisedFebruary 22, 1988, October 13, 1988 and February 15, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications (TS) for fuel storage for the diesel fire pumps. The revisedTS will require 150 gallons of fuel for each of two fire pump diesel engine.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 26, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 26, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>65 <T3>Possession-Only License No. DPR-45. </T3>The amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 8, 1988 (53 FR 11718). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 26, 1989. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>La Crosse Public Library,800 Main Street, La Crosse, Wisconsin 54601. <ITAG tagnum="84">Detroit Edison Company, Docket No. 50-16, Fermi Unit No. 1, Monroe,Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>May 17, 1985 as supplementedby letters dated July 23, 1986, September 15, 1986, September 25, 1987,September 15, 1988 and December 22, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment renews Possession-OnlyLicense No. DPR-9 until March 20, 2025 and revises Technical Specificationsto be consistant with current defueled, SAFSTOR status of Fermi 1 and currentNRC rules and guidance. Continued SAFSTOR until 2025 will significantlyreduce potential exposure to workers and the amount of radioactive wasteproduced during final decontamination of the facility. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Effective Date: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>9 <T3>Possession-Only License No. DPR-9</T3> <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 7, 1985 (50 FR 46371). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 28, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Monroe County Library System,13700 South Custer Road, Monroe, Michigan 48161. <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-369 and 50-370, McGuire NuclearStation, Units 1 and 2, Mecklenburg County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>May 14, 1986, as supplementedNovember 21, 1986, and revised April 25, 1988, and April 5, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments modify the TechnicalSpecifications by deleting tables of containment penetrations and isolationvalves which have been incorporated into the Final Safety Analysis Report.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>74 and 76 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-9 and NPF-17: </T3>Amendments revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 22, 1989 (54 FR 7631). Because theApril 5, 1989, submittal clarified certain aspects of the original request,the substance of the changes noticed in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and the proposed no significant hazards determinationwere not affected. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendmentsis contained in a Safety Evaluation dated April 28, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Atkins Library, Universityof North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223 <ITAG tagnum="84">Duquesne Light Company, Docket No. 50-334, Beaver Valley Power Station,Unit No. 2, Shippingport, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 30, 1989, as supplementedMarch 9, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises the licenseconditions regarding the plant safety monitoring system, detailed controlroom design review and safety parameter display system by changing thefull implementation date of certain issues from the first refueling outageto the second refueling outage. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 26, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 26, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>16 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-73. </T3>Amendment revised the operatinglicense. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 8, 1989 (54 FR 9917). The licensee's letterdated March 9, 1989 provides detailed information about the requested changes,and does not alter the original request. The Commission's related evaluationof the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated April 26, 1989.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>B. F. Jones Memorial Library,663 Franklin Avenue, Aliquippa, Pennsylvania 15001. <ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket No. 50-366, EdwinI. Hatch Nuclear Plant, Unit 2, Appling County, Georgia </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 23, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment modified the TechnicalSpecifications to allow Type C local leak rate tests to be conducted onthe main steam isolation valves at intervals not to exceed two years andto specify the test pressure. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>99 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-5. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 8, 1989 (54 FR 9917). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 28, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Appling County Public Library,301 City Hall Drive, Baxley, Georgia 31513 <ITAG tagnum="84">GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-219, Oyster Creek NuclearGenerating Station, Ocean County, New Jersey </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>July 24, 1986 as revised February19, 1988 and supplemented October 13 and November 16, 1988 and January12, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changes TechnicalSpecifications 3.5.A.3 and 4.5 for containment integrated leak rate testingto reflect compliance with Appendix J to 10 CFR 50. <T3>Date of Issuance: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>132 <T3>Provisional Operating License No. DPR-16. </T3>Amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>August 13, 1986 (51 FR 29023) and March 22,1989 (54 FR 11838). The Commission's related evaluation of this amendmentis contained in a Safety Evaluation dated April 24, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Ocean County Library, ReferenceDepartment, 101 Washington Street, Toms River, New Jersey 08753. <ITAG tagnum="84">GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-289, Three Mile IslandNuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Dauphin County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 2, 1988, December19, 1988 and January 31, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment consolidates anumber of minor administrative changes requested by the licensee to makethe Technical Specifications consistent with changes to NRC regulations,plant procedures, previous amendments and NRC guidance. <T3>Date of Issuance: </T3>April 27, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 27, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>149 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-50. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 22, 1989 (54 FR 7636) and March 8,1989 (54 FR 9917). The Commission's related evaluation of this amendmentis contained in a Safety Evaluation dated April 27, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Government Publications Section,State Library of Pennsylvania, Walnut Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105. <ITAG tagnum="84">Illinois Power Company, Docket No. 50-461, Clinton Power Station,Unit 1, DeWitt County Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 26, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed change will revisea core flow and thermal power surveillance for single loop operation. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 20, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 20, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>22 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-62. </T3>The amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 8, 1989 (54 FR 9918). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 20, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>The Vespasian Warner PublicLibrary, 120 West Johnson Street, Clinton, Illinois 61727. <ITAG tagnum="84">Iowa Electric Light and Power Company, Docket No. 50-331, Duane ArnoldEnergy, Center, Linn County, Iowa </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>September 15, 1986. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the DuaneArnold Energy Center Technical Specification requirements related to jetpump operability. The revision implements the improved monitoring guidelinescontained in General Electric Service Information Letter No. 330, ``JetPump Beam Cracks,'' June 9, 1980. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>158 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-49. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 20, 1987 (52 FR 18982). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 28, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Cedar Rapids Public Library,500 First Street, S. E., Cedar Rapids, Iowa 52401. <ITAG tagnum="84">Iowa Electric Light and Power Company, Docket No. 50-331, Duane ArnoldEnergy, Center, Linn County, Iowa </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>April 24, 1987. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment modified the DuaneArnold Energy Center Technical Specifications to conform with the modelRadiological Effluent Technical Specifications for Boiling Water Reactors(NUREG-0473, Revision 2). The changes made were administrative in natureand did not affect the technical content or intent of the previous specifications.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>159 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-49. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 23, 1989 (54 FR 12034). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 28, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Cedar Rapids Public Library,500 First Street, S. E., Cedar Rapids, Iowa 52401. <ITAG tagnum="84">Louisiana Power and Light Company, Docket No. 50-382, Waterford SteamElectric Station, Unit 3, St. Charles Parish, Louisiana </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 23, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications to incorporate the correct operating range for the ContainmentArea Radiation Monitors and clarify the radiation background setpoint forcontainment purge and exhaust isolation. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 2, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 2, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>55 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-38. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 1, 1989 (54 FR 5163). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated May 2, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of New OrleansLibrary, Louisiana Collection, Lakefront, New Orleans, Louisiana 70122.<ITAG tagnum="84">Maine Yankee Atomic Power Company, Docket No. 50-309, Maine YankeeAtomic Power Station, Lincoln County, Maine </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>February 3, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The Moderator Temperature Coefficient(MTC) limit in Technical Specifications between the 0% and 30% power levels.The new limit is a line from 0.6 x 10-4 delta rho per anddegrees; F at 0%power to the current limit of 0.5 x 10-4 delta rho per anddegrees; F at 30%power. The MTC limit above 30% power is unchanged. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>111 <T3>Facilty Operating License No. DPR-36: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 22, 1989 (54 FR 11839). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated March 2, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Wiscasset Public Library,High Street, P.O.Box 367, Wiscasset, Maine 04578. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>J. A. Ritsher, Esq., Ropes and Gray, 225Franklin Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02210. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>R. Wessman <ITAG tagnum="84">Maine Yankee Atomic Power Company, Docket No. 50-309, Maine YankeeAtomic Power Station, Lincoln County, Maine </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>February 15, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment modifies the TechnicalSpecification Table 3.9-3, Accident Monitoring Instrumentation, and Table4.1-3, to add the Primary Inventory Trend System for reactor vessel levelindication and core exit thermocouples channel operability and surveillancerequirements to the Technical Specifications. Also, minor editorial changesare proposed to Tables 3.9-3 and 4.1-3 of the Technical Specifications.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>112 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-36: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 22, 1989 (5411840). The Commission's relatedevaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated April24, 1989. <T3>No signficant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Wiscasset Public Library,High Street, P. O. Box 367, Wiscasset, Maine 04578. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>J. A. Ritsher, Esq., Ropes and Gray, 225Franklin Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02210. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>R. Wessman <ITAG tagnum="84">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, Docket No. 50-245, Millstone NuclearPower Station, Unit No. 1, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 24, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>Clarification of emergency corecooling system availability and power supply requirements and editorialcorrections to technical specifications. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 2, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 2, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3> 31 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-21. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 31, 1989 (54 FR 13259). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated May 2, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waterford Public Library,49 Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385. <ITAG tagnum="84">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-336, MillstoneNuclear Power Station, Unit No. 2, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>October 14, 1986, July 21,1982 and January 12, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment incorporates LimitingConditions for Operation and Surveillance Requirements for the ReactorVessel Coolant Level instrumentation in Technical Specification 3/4.3.3.8,``Instrumentation - Accident Monitoring.'' <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 21, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 21, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>140 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-65. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 8, 1989 (54 FR 6200). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 21, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waterford Public Library,49 Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385. <ITAG tagnum="84">Omaha Public Power District, Docket No. 50-285, Fort Calhoun Station,Unit No. 1, Washington County, Nebraska </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 6, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment modifies the TechnicalSpecifications (TS) to (1) change the containment spray system surveillancetesting requirements to provide a quantitative value to define the minimumacceptance criteria, (2) change the Basis of the containment spray systemsurveillance requirements by providing the minimum spray flow requirementsdetermined from analysis, (3) reduce the maximum power level permittedon Figure 2-7, Limiting Condition for Operation for Departure from NucleateBoiling Monitoring, (4) correct the neutron fluence value stated as occurringat 14 Effective Full Power Years (EFPY) at the inner surface of the reactorvessel wall at the critical weld location from 1.4 x 1019 n/cm2 to 1.21x 1019 n/cm2, (5) revise Figure 2-3, Predicted Radiation Induced NDTT Shift,based on calculations using US NRC Regulatory Guide 1.99, Revision 2, and(6) changing the references in TS 3.6 from ``FSAR'' to ``USAR'' and addingan additional reference to USAR Section 14.16. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 26, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>Full implementation within 30 days from the dateof issuance. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>121 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-40. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 22, 1989 (54 FR 7638). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 26, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>W. Dale Clark Library, 215South 15th Street, Omaha, Nebraska 68102 <ITAG tagnum="84">Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-275 and 50-323, DiabloCanyon Nuclear Power Plant, Units 1 and 2, San Luis Obispo County, California</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>December 24, 1986 (ReferenceLAR 86-13) <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments revised TechnicalSpecification (TS) by (1) revising the surveillance intervals for certainreactor trip system and engineered safety features actuation system instrumentation,and (2) deleting the requirement to obtain and evaluate detector plateaucurves for the intermediate and power range neutron flux channels. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>36 and 35 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-80 and DPR-82: </T3>Amendmentschanged the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>August 12, 1987 (52 FR 29926). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 25, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>California Polytechnic StateUniversity Library, Government Documents and Maps Department, San LuisObispo, California 93407. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>George W. Knighton <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania. </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 27, 1989 as supplementedMarch 22, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changed the TechnicalSpecifications to accommodate the second refueling of the reactor whichinvolves the use of new, previously irradiated and reconstituted fuel assemblies.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>19 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-39. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 22, 1989 (54 FR 7642). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 24, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Service Electric andamp; Gas Company, Docket Nos. 50-272 and50-311, Salem Generating Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Salem County, NewJersey </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>November 27, 1985 and supplementedFebruary 15, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments modified the containmentcontainment isolation valve table, Technical Specification Table 3.6-1.The licensee has withdrawn a request to modify the limiting condition ofoperation involving these valves. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>Units 1 and 2, effective as of the date of issuanceand to be implemented within 30 days of the date of issuance. <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>92 and 67 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-70 and DPR-75. </T3>These amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>July 2, 1986 (51 FR 24261). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 24, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Salem Free Public Library,112 West Broadway, Salem, New Jersey 08079 <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Service Electric andamp; Gas Company, Docket Nos. 50-272 and50-311, Salem Generating Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Salem County, NewJersey </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>April 14, 1987 and supplementedon October 10, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>Deleted snubber tables from theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 1, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 1, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>93 and 68 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-70 and DPR-75. </T3>These amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 8, 1989 (54 FR 9927). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated May 1, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Salem Free Public Library,112 West Broadway, Salem, New Jersey 08079 <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Service Electric andamp; Gas Company, Docket No. 50-311, SalemGenerating Station, Unit No. 2, Salem County, New Jersey </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 27, 1983 and supplementedon January 3, 1986 and January 5, 1987. The supplements did not changethe technical requirements of the amendment request. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>Established system operabilityrequirements for the transfer functions of the emergency core cooling system(ECCS) semiautomatic switchover from safety Injection to Recirculationduring a loss of coolant accident (LOCA). <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 1, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>Before startup from the fifth refueling outagecurrently scheduled for March 1990. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>69 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-75: </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>August 2, 1983 (48 FR 35055). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated May 1, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Salem Free Public Library,112 West Broadway, Salem, New Jersey 08079 <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Service Electric andamp; Gas Company, Docket Nos. 50-272 and50-311, Salem Generating Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Salem County, NewJersey </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>July 23, 1987 as supplementedby letter dated March 16, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>Revised the Emergency Core CoolingSystem Technical Specifications and Bases. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 2, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 2, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>94 and 70 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-70 and DPR-75. </T3>These amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 8, 1989 (54 FR 9928). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated May 2, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Salem Free Public Library,112 West Broadway, Salem, New Jersey 08079 <ITAG tagnum="84">Rochester Gas and Electric Corporation, Docket No. 50-244, R. E. GinnaNuclear Power Plant, Wayne County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>February 16, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications to reflect the addition of steam generator sleeving andplugging criteria. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>35 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-35: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 22, 1989 (54 FR 11842). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 24, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Rochester Public Library,115 South Avenue, Rochester, New York 14610. <ITAG tagnum="84">Sacramento Municipal Utility District, Docket No. 50-312, Rancho SecoNuclear Generating Station, Sacramento County, California </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 12, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the TechnicalSpecification 4.11, ``Reactor Building Purge Exhaust Filtering System,''by changing the air flow rate through the reactor building purge valves,adding a requirement to test the Reactor Building Purge Exhaust HEPA filters,and clarifying in the bases the air flow rate difference with or withoutcontainment integrity. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 18, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 18, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>103 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-54: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>August 26, 1987 (52 FR 32210). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 18, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Martin Luther King RegionalLibrary, 7340 24th Street Bypass, Sacramento, California 95822. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>George W. Knighton <ITAG tagnum="84">South Carolina Electric andamp; Gas Company, South Carolina Public ServiceAuthority, Docket No. 50-395, Virgil C. Summer Nuclear Station, Unit No.1, Fairfield County, South Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>September 16, 1986, as supplementedon August 18, 1987, July 22, and September 29, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changes the TechnicalSpecifications (TS) to delete Tables 4.6-1a, 4.6-1b, and 4.6-2 from TS3/4.6.1.6, ``Containment Structural Integrity,'' to reduce the minimumrequired average tendon force for each tendon group, and to modify thetendon force base values. Also, associated TS Bases for the reactor buildingstructural integrity are amplified to refer to the Summer Nuclear StationSurveillance Test Procedure for base values. The proposed change to TS4.6.1.6.1.a, to utilize 21 tendons rather than 15 tendons for the ten yearsurveillance and subsequent five year intervals, was denied. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>76 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-12. </T3>Amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 5, 1986 (51 FR 40282). The August 18,1987, July 22 and July 29, 1988 submittals provided clarifying informationthat did not change the initial determination of no significant hazardsconsideration published in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>The Commission's related evaluation of the amendmentis contained in a Safety Evaluation dated April 28, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Fairfield County Library,Garden and Washington Streets, Winnsboro, South Carolina 29180. <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>June 10, 1987 (TS 87-28) <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments will transferrequirements from Section 3/4.3.3.1, ``Radiation Monitoring Instrumentation,''to Section 3/4.3.3.7, ``Accident Monitoring Instrumentation,'' of the SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Technical Specifications. These changes relateto the post-accident containment area monitors and noble gas effluent monitors.These monitors are addressed in Items II.F.1.3 and II.F.1.1, respectively,of NUREG-0737, ``TMI Action Plan Requirements,'' dated November 1980. Forthe post-accident noble gas effluent monitors, requirements are being addedto the TS. The amendment for Unit 1 also corrects a typographical erroron Page 3/4.3-42: ``Moses'' should be ``Modes.'' This application superseded and withdrew the proposed changes on thesemonitors in the licensee's applications dated January 25, 1984 and December9, 1985. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 28, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>112, 102 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-77 and DPR-79. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>October 21, 1987 (52 FR 39308). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 28, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <ITAG tagnum="84">The Cleveland Electric Illuminating Company, Duquesne Light Company,Ohio Edison Company, Pennsylvania Power Company, Toledo Edison Company,Docket No. 50-440, Perry Nuclear Power Plant, Unit No. 1, Lake County,Ohio </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>November 28, 1988, amendedDecember 29, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications (TS) to increase the minimum critical power ratio (MCPR)from 1.06 to 1.07, added two limiting lattice most-limiting average planarlinear heat generation rate (MAPLHGR) curves to the TS to account for newfuel types being used this cycle, and deleted the MAPLHGR curve for naturaluranium bundles. Additionally, limiting conditions for operation and actionstatements for the APLHGR were revised to reflect the lattice-dependentMAPLHGR limits in the GESTAR analysis and the default limits in the TSfor hand calculations. Figure 3.2.2-1 was revised to correct the extrapolatedvalue for the flow-dependent MCPR and Figure 3.2.1-4 was revised to extendthe flow-dependent MAPLHGR factor down to the 20% rated core flow line.Curves A-A' and B-B' were deleted from the current set of MCPR parametriccurves and the TS for linear heat generation rate (LHGR) was revised toreflect the higher LHGR associated with the new fuel. The definition of``critical power ratio'' was generalized and clarification of how power-dependentMAPLHGR factors are applied to lattice MAPLHGR's was added. Various figuresand pages were renumbered and the associated bases for the above TS changeswere revised. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 26, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 26, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>20 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-58. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 1, 1989 (54 FR 5177). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 26, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Perry Public Library, 3753Main Street, Perry, Ohio 44081 <ITAG tagnum="84">Toledo Edison Company and The Cleveland Electric Illuminating Company,Docket No. 50-346, Davis-Besse Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 1, OttawaCounty, Ohio </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>June 17, 1985 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the TechnicalSpecification 3.7.1.1 concerning the Limiting Condition for Operation forthe main steam line safety valves. The change will require that when mainsteam safety valves are inoperable that the plant go to Mode 4 (hot shutdown)within 12 hours following entry to Mode 3 (hot standby), rather than toMode 5 (cold shutdown). <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>132 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-3. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 23, 1988 (53 FR 9517). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 25, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of Toledo Library,Documents Department, 2801 Bancroft Avenue, Toledo, Ohio 43606. <ITAG tagnum="84">Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-271, VermontYankee Nuclear Power Station, Vernon, Vermont </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>November 18, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications (TS) to add limiting conditions for operation and surveillancerequirements for the RCIC System and the HPCI System resulting from improvementsrequired by NUREG-0737, Item II.K.3.13 and II.K.3.22. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>111 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-28: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 22, 1989 (54 FR 11846). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 24, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Brooks Memorial Library,224 Main Street, Brattleboro, Vermont 05301. <ITAG tagnum="84">Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-280 and 50-281,Surry Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Surry County, Virginia. </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>July 29, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments revise the TechnicalSpecifications to include the downstream manual isolation valves in thedemonstration of operability of the reactor head vent path. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 27, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 27, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>125 and 125 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-32 and DPR-37: </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>August 24, 1988 (53 FR 32301). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 27, 1989 <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Swem Library, College ofWilliam and Mary, Williamsburg, Virginia 23185. <ITAG tagnum="84">Wisconsin Electric Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-266 and 50-301, PointBeach Nuclear Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Town of Two Creeks, Manitowoc County,Wisconsin </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>February 24, 1989 and supplementedon March 3, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments revise the permissiblebypass conditions for item 3.b, ``Auxiliary Feedwater,'' of Technical SpecificationTable 15.3.5-3, ``Emergency Cooling.'' <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 25, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>119 and 122 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-24 and DPR-27. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 22, 1989 (54 FR 11847). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated April 25, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Joseph P. Mann Library, 1516Sixteenth Street, Two Rivers, Wisconsin. <ITAG tagnum="84">Wolf Creek Nuclear Operating Corporation, Docket No. 50-482, WolfCreek Generating Station, Coffey County, Kansas </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 7, 1986 and as amended onMarch 30, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The purpose of the license amendmentincorporated Technical Specification LCO and surveillance requirementsfor the steam generator Atmospheric Relief Valves (ARVs) into the WolfCreek Operating License in order to assure the availability of mitigatingequipment assumed in the Steam Generator Tube Rupture analysis. The TechnicalSpecification requirements constitute additional limitations on facilityoperations and satisfy, in part, the specific requirements of License Condition2.c(11) of the operating license. No requirements on ARV operability havebeen included in the existing Wolf Creek Technical Specifications becausethe ARVs have not been required in the mitigation of postulated accidentsand transients. <T3>Date of Issuance: </T3>April 20, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>April 20, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>30 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-42. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>December 30, 1986 (51 FR 47080). The March 30,1989 submittal provided additional clarifying information and did not changethe finding of the initial notice. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in aSafety Evaluation dated April 20, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room Location: </T3>Emporia State University,William Allen White Library, 1200 Commercial Street, Emporia, Kansas 66801and Washburn University School of Law Library, Topeka, Kansas 66621 <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATING LICENSE ANDFINAL DETERMINATION OF NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION AND OPPORTUNITYFOR HEARING (EXIGENT OR EMERGENCY CIRCUMSTANCES) </ITAG>During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commissionhas issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined foreach of these amendments that the application for the amendment complieswith the standards and requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, asamended (the Act), and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commissionhas made appropriate findings as required by the Act and the Commission'srules and regulations in 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the licenseamendment. Because of exigent or emergency circumstances associated with the datethe amendment was needed, there was not time for the Commission to publish,for public comment before issuance, its usual 30-day Notice of Considerationof Issuance of Amendment and Proposed No Significant Hazards ConsiderationDetermination and Opportunity for a Hearing. For exigent circumstances,the Commission has either issued a <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice providing opportunity for public commentor has used local media to provide notice to the public in the area surroundinga licensee's facility of the licensee's application and of the Commission'sproposed determination of no significant hazards consideration. The Commissionhas provided a reasonable opportunity for the public to comment, usingits best efforts to make available to the public means of communicationfor the public to respond quickly, and in the case of telephone comments,the comments have been recorded or transcribed as appropriate and the licenseehas been informed of the public comments. In circumstances where failure to act in a timely way would have resulted,for example, in derating or shutdown of a nuclear power plant or in preventionof either resumption of operation or of increase in power output up tothe plant's licensed power level, the Commission may not have had an opportunityto provide for public comment on its no significant hazards determination.In such case, the license amendment has been issued without opportunityfor comment. If there has been some time for public comment but less than30 days, the Commission may provide an opportunity for public comment.If comments have been requested, it is so stated. In either event, theState has been consulted by telephone whenever possible. Under its regulations, the Commission may issue and make an amendment immediatelyeffective, notwithstanding the pendency before it of a request for a hearingfrom any person, in advance of the holding and completion of any requiredhearing, where it has determined that no significant hazards considerationis involved. The Commission has applied the standards of 10 CFR 50.92 and has made afinal determination that the amendment involves no significant hazardsconsideration. The basis for this determination is contained in the documentsrelated to this action. Accordingly, the amendments have been issued andmade effective as indicated. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendmentssatisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impactstatement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments.If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the specialcircumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determinationbased on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applicationfor amendment, (2) the amendment to Facility Operating License, and (3)the Commission's related letter, Safety Evaluation and/or EnvironmentalAssessment, as indicated. All of these items are available for public inspectionat the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street,NW., Washington, DC, and at the local public document room for the particularfacility involved. A copy of items (2) and (3) may be obtained upon request addressed to theU.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Director,Division of Reactor Projects. The Commission is also offering an opportunity for a hearing with respectto the issuance of the amendments. By June 16, 1989, the licensee may filea request for a hearing with respect to issuance of the amendment to thesubject facility operating license and any person whose interest may beaffected by this proceeding and who wishes to participate as a party inthe proceeding must file a written petition for leave to intervene. Requestsfor a hearing and petitions for leave to intervene shall be filed in accordancewith the Commission's ``Rules of Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings''in 10 CFR Part 2. If a request for a hearing or petition for leave to interveneis filed by the above date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and LicensingBoard, designated by the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safetyand Licensing Board Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition andthe Secretary or the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board willissue a notice of hearing or an appropriate order. As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall setforth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceedingand how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding.The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention shouldbe permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) thenature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to theproceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial,or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of anyorder which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest.The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subjectmatter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Anyperson who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has beenadmitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave ofthe Board up to fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfythe specificity requirements described above. Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to thepetition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions whichare sought to be litigated in the matter, and the bases for each contentionset forth with reasonable specificity. Contentions shall be limited tomatters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. A petitionerwho fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirementswith respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participateas a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subjectto any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have theopportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, includingthe opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. Since the Commission has made a final determination that the amendmentinvolves no significant hazards consideration, if a hearing is requested,it will not stay the effectiveness of the amendment. Any hearing held wouldtake place while the amendment is in effect. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filedwith the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Service Branch, or may bedelivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building,2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, by the above date. Where petitionsare filed during the last ten (10) days of the notice period, it is requestedthat the petitioner promptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephonecall to Western Union at 1-(800) 325-6000 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700).The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number3737 and the following message addressed to (<T3>Project Director</T3>): petitioner's name and telephone number; datepetition was mailed; plant name; and publication date and page number ofthis <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. A copy of the petition should also besent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions,supplemental petitions and/or requests for hearing will not be entertainedabsent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or theAtomic Safety and Licensing Board, that the petition and/or request shouldbe granted based upon a balancing of the factors specified in 10 CFR 2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v)and 2.714(d). <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>May 2, 1989 (TS 89-23) <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments delete the remoteshutdown instrumentation requirements for full-length, control rod positionlimit switches in Tables 3.3-9 and 4.3-6. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>May 4, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>May 4, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>113, 103 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-77 and DPR-79. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Public comments requested as to proposed no significant hazards consideration:</T3>No. The amendment application was processed on an emergency basis,pursuant to 10 CFR 50.91(a)(5). The Commission's related evaluation iscontained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 4, 1989. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <T3>NRC Assistant Director: </T3>Suzanne Black <ITAG tagnum="21">Dated at Rockville, Maryland, this 11th day of May, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Gary M. Holahan, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Director, Division of Reactor Projects - III, IV, V and SpecialProjects Office of Nuclear Reactor Regulation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[Doc. 89-XXXX Filed X-X-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7590-01-D </ITAG></TEXT></DOC>